Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
Number of Reviews
39

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Magnolia (1999)
Jason Robards, Julianne Moore, Tom Cruise, Philip Seymour Hoffman,
John C. Reilly, Melora Walters, Jeremy Blackman, Michael Bowen,
William H. Macy, Philip Baker Hall, Melinda Dillon, Emmanuel
Johnson. Written and directed by Paul Thomas Anderson. 188 minutes.
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests
to ejohnsonott@prodigy.net or e-mail ejohnsonott-subscribe@onelist.com
with the word "subscribe" in the subject line.
After an epic like "Boogie Nights," you might expect a young
writer/director like Paul Thomas Anderson to follow it up with
something short and breezy. Instead, the 28-year-old has crafted a
wildly ambitious mosaic featuring multiple storylines, roughly 30
speaking roles and a meteorological event of biblical
proportions. "Magnolia" is a sprawling look at 24 hours in the lives
of a group of Southern Californians. Overstuffed and overwhelming, the
production is at times frustrating, but just as often exhilarating,
with several tour de force performances from its superb cast. The
ultimate compliment I can pay "Magnolia" is this: even though the film
is slightly over three hours long, I can hardly wait to see it again.
After a stylish prologue emphasizing that "strange things happen all
the time," Anderson plunges into his fractured tale of alienation and
spiritual malaise in the San Fernando Valley, introducing a vast array
of characters. Earl Partridge (Jason Robards) is a desperately ill man
reflecting on his failures as a husband and father. His current wife,
Linda (Julianne Moore), can't deal with his impending death. Luckily,
Earl has a nurse (Philip Seymour Hoffman) who is utterly devoted to
caring for his needs.
Earl's estranged son Frank (Tom Cruise) is a ferocious motivational
speaker, mesmerizing lost, angry men with his "Seduce and Destroy"
seminars. He augments his "Respect the Cock" philosophy with
instructional segments like "How to fake that you are a caring
person." Essentially, Frank is the guy who would teach Sex-Ed to
members of the "Fight Club."
The emotional and moral center of the movie is Jim Kurring (John
C. Reilly), a sweet, compassionate police officer who places the
importance of "doing good and helping others" above all else. Jim
meets Claudia (Melora Waters), an overstrung druggie determined to
remain alone in her despair. She touches something in Jim, who builds
the courage to ask her on a date.
Jim also has a memorable encounter with Donnie Smith (William
H. Macy), who was once a famous whiz kid on a '60s game show. Now,
Donnie works a dull job and spends his off-hours looking for love.
Getting dizzy yet? Wait, there's more. Donnie's contemporary
counterpart is young Stanley Spector (Jeremy Blackman), a boy genius
enjoying a hot streak on a current game show. His tyrannical father
lives, both vicariously and financially, off his son and drives the
kid mercilessly. Incidentally, the host of the show is Claudia's
father, Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall), who has considerable
emotional baggage of his own.
If this laundry list of characters and situations looks daunting on
paper, rest assured that it is somehow more coherent on film. Although
Anderson's flamboyant camera ricochets wildly throughout his tattered
ensemble, the movie flows like some cracked symphony. Aimee Mann
provides the music and her tunes unify the desolate emotional
landscape. In one brilliant sequence, a character begins singing along
to Mann's song, "Save Me." One by one, other cast members, living and
dead, also begin singing from their various locations. The bizarre
chorus is at one strangely beautiful and achingly sad; even in unison,
these people are so very, very isolated.
Admittedly, there is too much going on in "Magnolia" and Anderson
periodically loses his footing. The father-son exchanges at the
contemporary game show are overly obvious and the director allows
Jason Robards to ham it up excessively during his latter scenes. But
the rest of the film more than makes up for its deficits. There are
scenes of stunning impact here, and the superb cast makes the
expansive screenplay shine.
Two performances in particular stand out. Tom Cruise positively
crackles as the perversely charismatic selfish-help guru. His
explosive work here almost seems like a catharsis for the restraint
demanded of him in "Eyes Wide Shut." In fact, one of his best moments
is an improvisational bit that occurs during an interview scene. At
Anderson's urging, Cruise abruptly stripped to his shorts before
delivering a sputtering erotic diatribe that is as frightening as it
is impressive.
But John C. Reilly is the heart of "Magnolia" [NOTE: An interview with
Reilly follows this review]. The superb character actor gets a chance
to be a romantic lead and carries off his part with subtlety and
charm. Reilly's idealistic officer could easily have turned mawkish,
but he keeps the man genuine, even during his lofty idealistic
speeches. Officer Jim is compassion personified, and he
single-handedly rescues the story from terminal melancholy.
Something else happens in "Magnolia," something extraordinary, but I
won't tell you about it. Suffice to say it is audacious, wondrous and
totally successful. While the same cannot be said about "Magnolia" as
a whole, I'll happily take a flawed masterpiece like this over the
more pedestrian offerings of other directors any day. "Magnolia" makes
important statements about family, self-absorption and the dangerous
direction our increasingly fragmented culture is taking, and Paul
Thomas Anderson delivers his messages with grand imagination and
daring.
You may not recognize John C. Reilly's name, but you'll never forget his face. Reilly has a great mug, with the kind of distinctive features that make him a natural for a wide variety of character roles. But in Paul Thomas Anderson's "Magnolia," Reilly is not only the film's romantic lead, but its moral center as well. The 34-year-old actor didn't realize his lofty place in the story until after the fact. "I think it's a credit to Paul that he didn't let that be a distraction to what we were doing," he explained during a recent phone interview. "He just let me focus on what this guy was going through on this particular day. So, the heart of the movie, the moral center of the movie, all that stuff, I learned in retrospect."
Reilly and Anderson first hooked up at the Sundance New Filmmakers Workshop, where upcoming filmmakers are given the chance to cast professional actors for video projects. Professional editors, acting as mentors, work with the resultant footage. Two years before shooting his first feature, "Hard Eight," Anderson attended the workshop and Reilly was his first choice from the talent pool. "I'd done a dozen or so movies at that time," said Reilly, "and he knew all of them. He was already a student of my work, so I met him and we've been really good friends since then. We immediately clicked; we were on the same wavelength. He just appreciates what I do as an actor."
A product of a rough neighborhood on Chicago's Southwest side, Reilly began performing in local theater as a child. "I was eight or nine years old and kind of hanging out with this shoplifting crowd at the time. It was kind of a rough Irish-Lithuanian working-class kind of neighborhood and there was this park with a field house where they had wood class and tap dance class and drama class. This friend of mine from grammar school said one day 'Hey, I'm going to the park to go to drama class, want to come with?' I didn't even know what drama meant, but I just loved the playfulness of it."
When I asked if the "shoplifting crowd" taunted him over going into theater, Reilly replied, "Not when I was a kid. They thought I was funny, so they enjoyed that I did that. They were just kind of amused by it. Now, in high school there was a little bit of stigma. 'Oh, there's the play people,' you know? But by that point I'd been doing it for ten years, so I didn't really care what people thought. I went to a boy's Catholic high school in Chicago and I would go to the girl's Catholic high school to do plays." With a chuckle, he added, "So I'd be doing like two or three plays at a time and I thought I was just the luckiest guy in the world, to be surrounded by all of these Catholic school girls, doing 'The Pajama Game' and stuff like that."
Reilly's affinity for acting turned into a way of life. He was accepted at the prestigious Goodman School of Drama and went on to perform in "The Grapes of Wrath" on Broadway. His film career began as a Vietnam War recruit in Brian De Palma's "Casualties of War." Reilly has since appeared in 21 other films, including all three of Anderson's works. He enjoys being a part of the director's acting ensemble. "Paul is incredibly loyal, he finds the people he likes and your relationship just gets deeper the more you work with him. Also, he doesn't have a lot of patience for explaining his vision to people. So if he works with the same people over and over again, you develop a kind of shorthand. Like he and I, at this point, it's almost like we communicate on the set with a series of grunts and hand signals. It saves a lot of time."
Of his three films with Paul Thomas Anderson, Reilly holds a special place for "Hard Eight." "I've got a soft spot in my heart for the first one," he said. "Just because of the simpleness, and how quiet that movie is. I think 'Boogie Nights' is certainly the most fun and I have such fond memories of it, that crazy summer when we shot it. And 'Magnolia,' to tell you the truth, as much as I love the movie and am so moved by it I've seen it three times and the last time I watched it, it just broke my heart too much. It was like 'Oh, I need to take a little time off before I see this one again.' It's just so heartbreaking, a lot of it."
The extended family created by Anderson is now a mainstay in Reilly's life. Starting next month, he begins a five-month run with his "Boogie Nights" buddy Philip Seymour Hoffman on Broadway in "True West." "It's a major revival of the play," Reilly said enthusiastically, "I actually was the first guy in on this one. I met the director and was really impressed. He has a strong point of view on how to present the play and so, even though it's a challenging part and a lot of work, I was ready. They wanted me to do it and said 'Who do you think could play your brother' and the first name out of my mouth was Philip Seymour Hoffman." Reilly convinced Hoffman to meet with the director, everything clicked, and rehearsals start January 10th.
The idea of repeating the same lines for five months sounds daunting, to say the least, but Reilly is excited at the prospect. "It recharges you. It makes you a better actor. It's kind of like the Olympics for an actor. The audiences are always different. Just when you think you can predict what an audience will do, they surprise you. 
"It's also very freeing," he continued. "After doing a lot of movies you end up feeling kind of like an employee, although that's certainly not the case with Paul, because Paul is very special in the way he lets us go off and interpret things. But with a lot of directors you're in service of some greater thing. Theater is different. You go through a sort of organic process in rehearsal and make some collective decisions about how things are going to go. Then you're turned loose on stage for two hours and it's really exhilarating. I love to play with an audience and, from the time I was eight until the time I was 22, all I did was plays, so this feels like returning to what I'm best at."
This summer, Reilly costars with George Clooney and another ensemble friend, "Boogie Nights" star Mark Wahlberg, in the highly anticipated film, "The Perfect Storm," about the fishermen of the Andrea Gail and their tragic encounter with the largest storm to hit the North Atlantic this century. "We tried to be as sensitive as we could be to the memory of them," he explained. "We just tried to portray the fishermen in a truthful way. That will be the best testament to what their lives were about. These guys all really loved their way of life." Reilly acknowledged that the movie takes a few dramatic liberties in terms of drama and interpretations of the characters. "In some ways it's a combination of a bunch of different stories of fishermen from the area. All the things that happen in the movie really happened, they just all didn't happen on this one trip." A fishing boat captain who worked on the Andrea Gail for many years was present on the set everyday. "He kept us tuned in t!
!
!
o the reality," Reilly said quietly.
Being able to work with Mark Wahlberg again was a real treat for the actor. "I love Mark. He just gets better and better. He's a natural. We became friends on 'Boogie Nights,' we really hit it off. Mark also comes from a less than glamorous background; he came from some pretty tough streets himself." Like many, Reilly is amazed at how quickly Wahlberg made the transition from pop culture icon to serious actor. "He has a natural ability to find the truth. He came into 'Boogie Nights' and I didn't know who the hell he was I knew about all the pop culture stuff that you mentioned, but I didn't know if the guy could pull it off acting wise, so I was a little bit skeptical when we started. But he was right in there, I couldn't believe it! Because I go crazy when I'm improvising and stuff, and it can be a challenge if you're not ready or not willing to jump in there as well, and Mark just jumped right in. He was so right there. We had a blast on that movie. I'm just so proud of Mar!
!
!
k. He's really good in 'The Perfect Storm' too. He's from the area, around Boston, so can really relate to the whole way of life." 
As for John C. Reilly's next collaboration with Paul Thomas Anderson, all the actor knows is that it's coming soon. "He gives these little scheduling hints. He said, 'You're doing this play with Phil, huh? When does it end?' I said 'End of May or June' and he said 'Perfect!' That's the only clue I've gotten so far."

Author
Steve Rhodes
MAGNOLIA, by writer/director Paul Thomas Anderson (BOOGIE NIGHTS), is a
large and uneven collage of relatively unrelated stories with themes of
love and death, truth and lies, and guilt and redemption.  The best of
the segments are absolutely mesmerizing, but the worst of them are
seat-numbingly tedious.
The forecast for the San Fernando Valley on the day that the picture
takes place is "party cloudy with an 82% chance of rain."  But like most
motion pictures, the prop department never stocks umbrellas, a fact
which never ceases to amaze me.
Although the movie has a cast of thousands, the stories are really
individual ones.  To underscore this, the film's killer score starts
with a long and loud rendition of "One Is The Loneliest Number."
In a fascinating performance likely to get an Oscar nomination for best
supporting actor, Tom Cruise is Frank T.J. Mackey, a motivational
speaker for sex-crazed men who aren't getting enough.  The author of the
"Seduce and Destroy System," he preaches a take-no-prisoners approach to
sex.  A long-haired Cruise plays a man so stoked up that he would appear
to use cocaine rather than sugar on his breakfast cereal.  When he
demands coffee in one scene, the reaction is that, if ever a man didn't
need caffeine, it is Frank.
Anderson uses the dramatic theme music ("Also Sprach Zarathustra") from
2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY for Frank's introduction.  Bathed in light like a
rock star, Frank enters the room full of would-be world-class seducers
and lectures them on how to succeed with every woman they meet.  Frank
thinks with his private parts -- part of his anatomy that he teaches
must be "respected."
Generally Frank doesn't think much of woman as people, but he does see
some value in them.  "As we learn in Chapter 23," he instructs his
adoring male audience, "having a few chick friends lying around is handy
for setting up a jealousy trap."  Later, when confronted with the
reality of his parents, he comes completely unglued.  ("The most useless
thing in the world is what is behind me -- Chapter 3," he tells a
probing reporter who gets under his skin.)
Almost as good as Cruise is John C. Reilly as Officer Jim Kurring.  The
tender, shy cop hasn't had a date since he got his divorce three years
ago.  He looks for love with an unlikely date, a cokehead (Melora
Walters) whom he meets when she disturbs the neighbors with her noise.
Philip Baker Hall plays Jimmy Gator, the host of television's longest
running quiz show.  Jeremy Blackman plays Stanley Spector, the show's
current boy genius, and Michael Bowen plays the boy's obnoxious father.
(In a separate story William H. Macy plays a former boy genius from the
show.)  Once you learn that Jimmy is rapidly dying of cancer and that
Stanley needs to go to the bathroom but they won't let him, you can
guess some of what will happen on the show that day.
In the story's most uninteresting segments, Jason Robards plays Earl
Partridge, a man literally on his deathbed.  Robards, an actor whose
talents I find highly limited, gets way too much screen time for my
taste.  Philip Seymour Hoffman plays Earl's nurse, and Julianne Moore
plays his trophy wife.
Although the film starts with great momentum, Anderson loses it all by
dragging it out just past three hours.  The last hour, especially, is a
real snoozer.  Never even attempting to bring the stories together into
a satisfying whole, Anderson instead ends the movies with a ridiculous
conclusion introduced completely out of left field.
MAGNOLIA runs way too long at 3:02.  It is rated R for strong language,
drug use, sexuality and some violence and would be acceptable for older
and mature teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Donlee Brussel
Cast: Jason Robards, Philip Baker Hall, Tom Cruise, John C. Reilly,
Melora Walters, Julianne Moore, William H. Macy, Philip Seymour
Hoffman, Jeremy Blackman, Melinda Dillon
Director: Paul Thomas Anderson
Screenplay: Paul Thomas Anderson
185 minutes
Rated R
"There is the story of a boy genius, Stanley Spector.  And the game
show host, Jimmy Gator.  And the ex-boy genius, "Quiz Kid" Donnie
Smith.  There is the story of the dying man, Earl Partridge.  His lost
son, Frank T.J. Mackey.  And the dying man's wife, Linda Partridge.
The caretaker, Phil Parma.  And there is the story of a mother, Rose
Gator.  And the daughter, Claudia Wilson Gator.  And the police officer
in love, Jim Kurring.  And this will all make sense in the end."
The successor to "Boogie Nights" is mindblowingly
brilliant.  "Magnolia's" detractors will impute that this kaleidoscope
of avant-garde originality is too long.  Roger Ebert would say, "Those
who say it is too long have developed cinematic attention deficit
disorder."  Half the people who witness "Magnolia" will cherish and
extol it; the other half will hate it with a passion.
"Magnolia" is a collage of about ten separate stories.  Stanley Spector
(Jeremy Blackman) is the current wunderkind on the hit TV show "What Do
Kids Know" which is in its 33rd year hosted by Jimmy Gator (Philip
Baker Hall).  Stanley is three days away from breaking the record set
by "Whiz Kid" Donnie Smith (William H. Macy) decades ago.  Donnie is
currently working for Solomon Solomon (Alfred Molina), an electronic
store that uses Smith's celebrity status to lure customers.
Jimmy Gator's got issues; he's just been diagnosed with cancer and has
been given only two months to live.  His estranged daughter, Claudia
Wilson Gator (Melora Walters), is a coke-sniffing slut who hates him.
Walters is a stand out in "Magnolia" as a cracked and derailed twenty-
something.  She engages in meaningless anonymous sex and disturbs the
peace in her neighborhood.   Her mother, Rose Gator (Melinda Dillon) is
worried about both of them.  Jim Kurring (John C. Reilly) is the pious
cop who just happens to meet and falls in love with Claudia at first
sight.
Then, there's the Partridge Family.  Earl Partridge (Jason Robards) is
in his last days in a deathbed, all he has is his wife, Linda Partridge
(Julianne Moore), and nurse, Phil Parma (Philip Seymour Hoffman).  He
tells Phil his dying wish is to see his lost son, Frank T.J. Mackie
(Tom Cruise).  This is easily the most engrossing story in the film.
The best dialogue and acting comes from this tale.
Two-time Oscar winner Robards delivers several affective monologues,
Moore is at her PMSing best, and Tom Cruise gives the best performance
of his career as the cocky macho misogynist guru of "Seduce and
Destroy."  He plays a character oozing enough sleazy, slimy charisma to
earn my pick for "Best Sexist Performance of the 90s."
The man behind it all, Paul Thomas Anderson, is perhaps the most
talented writer in showbiz today next to Quentin Tarantino.  This guy
has more ingeniously clever ideas than Charlie Kaufman (Being John
Malkovich).  For example, each act in "Magnolia" is labeled by the
weather forecast.  He opens the film with a prologue made up of three
unrelated vignettes to prepare us for the forthcoming coincidences.
P.T. Anderson said, "The goal there was to have a lot of cinematic fun.
But it's also a promise that can be made very quickly- weird stories,
weird coincidences, and fucking strange shit will happen."
Indeed it does, one of the highlights of "Magnolia" is a sing along to
the oracular "Wise Up" by all the characters in different scenes.  It's
one of several idiosyncratically whimsical moments in this
masterpiece.  Jon Brion's score or one of Aimee Mann's mellifluous
songs usually accompanies these moments.  P.T. Anderson said, "I really
set out to write an adaptation of her songs... Her songs become the
built-in voice of the movie, tying all the stories together."  That and
a spectacular climax of biblical proportions that makes "Magnolia" all
the more a pičce de résistance.
Like a Kubrick film, some at first will hate "Magnolia."  However, 20
years from now, those same people who said they hated it will realize
its groundbreaking brilliance and say they loved it all along.

Author
Shannon Patrick Sullivan
Directed by Paul Thomas Anderson. Screenplay by Anderson. Starring Philip 
Baker Hall, Jason Robards, Tom Cruise. Running time: 188 minutes. Rated R 
for offensive language (MFCB). Reviewed on March 20th, 2000.
I am almost surprised to find myself reviewing "Magnolia", two months 
after viewing the film. But although I have seen several movies in the 
intervening weeks, the images of "Magnolia" have remained strong in my 
mind, and so here I sit at my keyboard. This is not to say that 
"Magnolia" is a perfect film; in some respects, it is deeply flawed. But 
it is one of those movies which demands to be viewed, contemplated, 
remembered, even if the verdict is not entirely positive.
"Magnolia" is the brainchild of Paul Thomas Anderson, and is a sequel of 
sorts to his "Boogie Nights", featuring many of the same cast and crew. 
Some critics have reviewed "Magnolia" on this basis, but I have not seen 
"Boogie Nights" (yet) and would prefer to discuss "Magnolia" on its own 
merits anyhow.
"Magnolia" tells the stories of several people on one day in California. 
Jim Kurring (John C Reilly) is a police officer who is well-meaning but 
sometimes too earnest. On a routine call, he meets drug-addled Claudia 
(Melora Walters). Claudia's father is popular game show host Jimmy Gator 
(Philip Baker Hall), who has recently learned he is dying and must now 
break the truth of his sordid private life to wife Rose (Melinda Dillon). 
The current star of Gator's quiz show is young Stanley Spector (Jeremy 
Blackman), both encouraged and terrorized by his father Rick (Michael 
Bowen). Stanley has raised the spectre of the legendary "Quiz Kid" Donnie 
Smith (William H Macy). Smith became famous on Gator's show, but has 
fallen on hard times as an adult and is now contemplating crime.
Meanwhile, Frank T.J. Mackey (Tom Cruise) is a "motivational" speaker who 
teaches men how to seduce women. Mackey's estranged father is rich TV 
producer Earl Partridge (Jason Robards), now on his deathbed in almost 
constant pain. Partridge is cared for by nurse Phil Parma (Philip Seymour 
Hoffman), who desperately wants to reunite father and son before Earl's 
imminent demise. Partridge's much younger wife is Linda (Julianne Moore), 
who married him for his money but has grown to love him, and does not 
know how to deal with his death.
There are a number of themes competing for attention in "Magnolia". The 
most obvious is that Strange Things Happen, introduced in three amusing 
opening vignettes. The movie, obviously, is awash with coincidence and 
happenstance, as characters from otherwise unrelated plot threads cross 
each other's paths. This theme is almost comically illustrated at two 
points in the film's second half: once when all the characters begin 
singing along to the excellent Aimee Mann soundtrack, and once shortly 
thereafter when a totally unanticipated event occurs. It would be 
criminal of me to reveal the controversial details of the latter, but 
suffice it to say that it is presaged by a few carefully-planted clues 
in the film itself (not to mention the prologue), and does not feel at all
out of place within "Magnolia"'s narrative framework. If the first event 
is the calm before the storm, the second is the storm itself; together 
they pave the way for the events that form the movie's conclusion.
While this in of itself would be the basis for an intriguing movie, and 
is certainly the fulcrum upon which "Magnolia" turns, there is a lot more 
going on. The struggle between fathers and children crops up often: 
between Hall and Walters, Robards and Cruise, Bowen and Blackman. Events 
have conspired to force each pair to confront their relationship, in one 
way or another, whether they want to or not.
Both Robards and Hall are dying. Both Moore and Walters wrestle with 
substance abuse. Both the Robards/Moore and Hall/Dillon marriages are 
built on a foundation of lies. Both Parma and Reilly are caregivers 
flailing in the face of their own impotence. Both Walters and Macy are 
looking for someone to take care of them. Macy has already suffered from 
the false glamour of childhood fame; now it looks as though Blackman may 
endure the same fate.
Even at over three hours, "Magnolia" is bursting with material, throwing 
so much at the viewer it is hard to get bored. But this is both its 
blessing and its curse: Anderson puts so much into the movie that some 
things get lost in the shuffle. It is difficult to tell if the movie 
really comes together, or just amounts to a lot of sound and fury. Early 
on, for example, Reilly investigates a murder which never gets resolved. 
Sure, it's not integral to the movie (Reilly's scenes with Dillon and 
Macy are much more important), but so much is made of it early on that 
ignoring it makes "Magnolia" feel incomplete. And a few of the subplots 
just don't feel as well-developed as others. Blackman and Bowen's 
relationship, in particular, gets short shrift compared to some of the 
other stories. It is ironic that, for such a long movie, one of the 
dominant feelings I was left with afterward was of wanting more. But 
maybe that isn't necessarily such a bad thing, either.
The large cast mainly rises to the quality of Anderson's script. Cruise's 
Oscar-nominated performance has gotten the most attention, and not 
undeservedly. Here he turns his public persona on its head in a role 
which matches "Eyes Wide Shut" for how deeply it plumbs. Also excellent 
is Hoffman, quiet yet passionate as Phil Parma. Really, only Moore 
disappoints, with a performance that can best be described as shrill. 
Although by no means bad, she does exhibit the skill shown in "The End of 
the Affair" and "An Ideal Husband".
"Magnolia" is a rarity in today's Hollywood: a film honestly deserving of 
the term 'epic'. Brilliantly acted, richly scripted, tantalizingly 
directed, it more than overcomes its flaws and proves to be a truly 
singular filmgoing experience. It is little wonder it has stayed so fresh 
in my mind so long; would that I could say the same about more movies.
Copyright Š 2000 Shannon Patrick Sullivan.
Archived at http://www.physics.mun.ca/~sps/movies/Magnolia.html

Author
Shay Casey
Year: 1999
Starring Tom Cruise, John C. Reilly, Jason Robards, Philip Baker Hall,
Melora Walters, Julianne Moore, William H. Macy, Philip Seymour Hoffman,
Jeremy Blackman, Melinda Dillon
Written by Paul Thomas Anderson
Directed by Paul Thomas Anderson
Rated R
"Magnolia" is the strangest kind of masterpiece, one that's both frustrating
and enthralling at the same time. Is it confusing? Almost certainly. But
there's a reason. "Magnolia" is the kind of film that wants to challenge
you, that assumes that you, the viewer, do indeed have a brain, and you do
know how to use it. Paul Thomas Anderson's film is not one to lay everything
out neatly for you. It's for this reason that "Magnolia" is consistently
maddening, but where that is usually a criticism, here it's oh so right.
Why? Because the film dares to surprise, to keep pulling the rug out from
under us. It is certainly not your typical film, and as such, it's not for
everyone. But to those who enjoy a challenging film open to more than one
interpretation, "Magnolia" is a dazzling experience. You don't see films as
ambitious and audacious as this one come along too often.
This film interlocks the stories of several apparently disparate characters
in the San Fernando Valley. First we have dying TV mogul Earl Partridge
(Jason Robards), who wastes away under the care of his gold-digging wife
Linda (Julianne Moore) and hired nurse Phil (Philip Seymour Hoffman). We are
introduced to a children's game show called "What Do Kids Know?" hosted by
veteran TV man Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall), who like Earl, is dying of
cancer. The current "whiz kid" on the show is Stanley Spector (Jeremy
Blackman), a young man pushed to succeed by his overbearing father. The
former whiz kid was Donnie Smith (William H. Macy), now a grown man whose
life is in a shambles. He loses his job and considers resorting to a life of
crime. Gator's daughter is cocaine-addicted Claudia (Melora Walters), who
finds herself attracted to Jim Kurring (John C. Reilly), a seemingly stable
beat cop. Earl's long-lost son turns out to be misogynist speaker Frank T.J.
Mackey (Tom Cruise), who teaches men how to better disrespect women because,
in his view, they don't respect men. The stories twist in and out of one
another in more ways than I could possibly explain here, but let's just say
many of them are rather unpredictable.
The most noticeable strong point of "Magnolia" is the bravura acting engaged
in by the entire cast. Your personal opinion of which performance is the
best may depend mostly on what you thought of the characters they played,
but there really aren't any weak links here. Everyone pulls his or her
weight. My personal favorite was John C. Reilly, whose cop balances a
fatherly impulse with deeper insecurities masterfully. As such, his
unconventional romance with the drug-addicted Walters seems positively
touching. His impulse is not to act as a policeman and bust her for
narcotics possession, but to help her escape the problem. Tom Cruise is
extremely well-cast as the self-important motivational speaker. His
breakdown to a female reporter during an interview is astoundingly
deliberate, with the reporter methodically wearing down Frank's false
bravado by pulling out revelations from his past. The only point where
Cruise really stumbles is in his final big scene, when he's forced to cry on
Robards' deathbed, and he displays that he hasn't quite got the acting chops
to pull it off. After excelling at playing freaks and weirdos, Hoffman
finally gets to play a more well-adjusted human being and does it very
convincingly. Macy does his usual chameleon job into the former quiz kid who
wants braces because he thinks they'll make him more attractive to his
favorite bartender. Moore has what's probably the most underwritten part,
but beefs it up with sheer force of talent. Her character is one-note, but
her performance is quite accessible. The veterans-Robards and Hall-inhabit
decaying forms with ease, with Hall's on-air breakdown being on of the more
fascinating scenes in the film. There are several I haven't mentioned, but
rest assured, they did fine work. No weak links.
After his critically-lauded hit "Boogie Nights," Paul Thomas Anderson seems
to have been given the freedom to follow his own vision, and "Magnolia" is
it. Anderson's vision is sprawling and confused, excitingly and wonderfully
so. The major stylistic point of interest is Anderson's decision to throw
standard three-act film structure out the window in favor of a more
musically-oriented construction. An article in "Entertainment Weekly" quoted
the director as saying that he drew greatly from The Beatles' "A Day in the
Life" for his film's structure. Such influence is evident in the way
"Magnolia" climaxes twice, each being preceded by a long and deliberate
buildup. The first climax occurs around the middle of the film, when many of
the major characters experience a certain public or private deflowering.
Gator collapses on his game show. Stanley has an on-air "accident." Frank is
exposed in an interview. And so on. Any old film might have then rushed to a
conclusion, but "Magnolia" is not any old film. Instead of a resolution, we
get a drop-off, and the tension starts building again. (With regards to the
Beatles reference, this is where Paul McCartney starts singing "Woke up, got
out of bed, dragged the comb across my head.") Then it climaxes again in a
wondrously bizarre scene that will have audiences talking for weeks. To
reveal it would be a crime, but it does serve a purpose other than to shock.
It ties together the film's themes in one fell swoop.
It's necessary because the themes present in "Magnolia" are not up front for
all to see. They can be seen in the subtle Biblical references (Exodus 8:2
is everywhere, but you have to look closely), in the vague connections
between characters, and in the film's clever opening sequence. "Magnolia"
starts with a narrator (Ricky Jay) relating three supposedly true stories of
chance occurrences. Coincidence and happenstance are recurring themes
throughout the film, with the final climax being the mother of all chance
occurrences. The most important thing to remember about "Magnolia's"
surprise finish is that it is not randomly inserted to test the audience's
reflexes. Jay narrates that these chance occurrences do not happen randomly;
they happen for a reason. The final scene seems to help certain characters
meet their destiny, to get other characters to meet when they might not have
otherwise. It also relates to another major recurring theme: family dynamics
and father-son relationships in particular. It seems a warning to many of
the film's characters not to repeat the sins of the past. Will the message
connect? That is left for us to decide.
It would be pointless to list all of Anderson's technical brilliance,
because it is all there, just like we saw in "Boogie Nights." He ties images
and music together seamlessly (with a nice assist from Aimee Mann), he is
remarkably able to intercut scenes together without losing coherence, and
his film manages to remain consistently interesting, despite the three hour
running time. But the most impressive aspect of "Magnolia" is how complex
Anderson's vision is. Is it perfect? That's kind of hard to decide. As is
often the case with films that tell many interconnecting narratives all at
once, different audience members are sure to find some characters intriguing
and others annoying, but which characters those are stems mostly from
personal preference than anything else. What we have here is a film whose
conviction manages to overshadow its flaws (I was mildly annoyed by Robards'
deathbed soliloquy and Moore's one-note drug addict), and one whose themes
are varied and challenging. If someone were to ask me just what was the
point of "Magnolia," I would reply that there isn't one. There are many.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Author
Jason Wallis
Magnolia
Rating (out of five): *****
Starring John C. Reilly, Tom Cruise, Jason Robards, Julianne Moore, Philip
Baker Hall, Philip Seymore Hoffman, Melora Walters, William H. Macy,
Jeremy Blackman, Alfred Molina, Luis Guzman and Ricky Jay
Directed by Paul Thomas Anderson
Written by Anderson
Rated R for profanity, drug use, brief nudity and suggested sex
Theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1
Released in 1999
Running 188 minutes
It's difficult to put into words the kind of impact that a film like
Magnolia leaves you with. It's a film so beautiful, so profound, so
unexplainably exhilarating that you can't help but feel charged after seeing
it. But.....
Let's get one thing straight right off the bat: this is not a film for
everybody. Something happens at the end of Magnolia that will be talked
about and pondered over for years to come, dividing critics and public alike
into those who see no relevance in the event, and those who see it as the
most original and innovative sequence in recent movie history. Taken at face
value, it's a plot twist so arbitrary and outlandish that it's likely to
send a good deal of theater patrons out the door, laughing and clutching
their sides (at the screening I attended, a good percentage of the audience
walked out in such a way).
Although, once examined and taken into context with the rest of the film, I
can think of no better way to end the movie. And it is your tolerance of
this ending that will finalize your feelings about the film. However,
despite what your personal opinion of the movie may be, there is no denying
its originality.
Sure, the basic premise is familiar; chronicling 24 hours in the lives of an
assortment of San Fernando Valley citizens, Magnolia probably sounds more
than a bit like Robert Altman's 1993 film Short Cuts, another
three-hour-plus drama interlinking various, seemingly-unrelated characters
and events. But it's director Paul Thomas Anderson's style that sets this
film apart from it apparent predecessor. While Altman's film was bitter and
pessimistic, Anderson shows a great deal of affection for each of his
creations.
>From foul-mouthed sex guru Frank T.J. Mackey (an Oscar-worthy Tom Cruise)
and his dying father (Jason Robards) to a kind-hearted cop played by John C.
Reilly (who also starred in Anderson's other two features, Hard Eight and
Boogie Nights), every character in Magnolia is treated with the utmost
respect. Nobody in the film's huge cast ever falters, and Anderson leads
them with such a sure hand that it's no surprise that they make up the best
ensemble performance I've seen in years.
But this is so much more than just a film showcasing great performances.
Tackling universal themes such as forgiveness and redemption like no movie I
've ever seen (and probably ever will see), Magnolia is a very important
achievement in the art of filmmaking.
At one point late in the picture, a key character observes that "you may be
done with the past, but the past ain't done with you". While most movies
would simply address this theme by use of conventional standards, Magnolia
reaches for something more, and conveys its theme with all the intensity and
rage of a thunderstorm. Therein lies its brilliance.
*Find all of Jason's reviews at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Author
Stephen Graham Jones
Traditionally, a commercial movie, no matter how experimental it pretends to
be, will nevertheless cling to at least one dramatic requirement: the
introduction, early on, of a problem, a question to be answered, something
to be solved. It's important to get the audience's interest piqued early on,
after all, else they won't pay attention. And the rules are simple: if it's
a detective movie, start moments after the crime; if it's action, blow
something up in the opening frames; if it's romance, start with heartbreak;
if it's horror, kill somebody mysteriously; if it's drama, say Rosebud. Give
us a starting point, something by which to gauge the progression of whatever
narrative arc follows, lest we won't be engaged with the thing, will pay
more attention to our popcorn/coke ratio. Or, in a movie better than three
hours long, like Magnolia, we'll start paying attention to bladder
elasticity, especially since Magnolia doesn't give us that initial problem
to be solved.
Thing is, though, it does something better, something unexpected. Instead of
involving us dramatically from the get-go, it offers a little narrated
preface--the ostensible 'author' speaking directly to us, documenting what
he calls 'matters of chance,' which comes to a handful of those
ultra-coincidental stories we see anthologized in all those Strange
Stories/Amazing Facts types books (if you're familiar with the Darwin
Awards, you'll recognize some of them). What the narrator's doing is trying
to extract meaning from those coincidental events, trying to make sense of a
jumbled set of 'accidents' that, for one beautiful moment, all came together
as something much greater than themselves, make the death they all conspired
in a work of art.
And now, after allowing us a few moments to swallow this, to agree with him
that strange forces are at work/play behind the curtains, the 'movie'
starts, and, coincidentally enough, it's all just jumbled stuff going on,
about as directionless as can be. Think Slacker, or--as we do have a cast so
large--Shortcuts. Lots of scene-hopping, simultaneity (contiguity), more
characters than you can initially remember names for, much less
relationships between. Yet, all the same, you're not only interested, you're
likely watching closer than you've watched any of those movies with
'traditional' hook-openings. Why? Because of the preface, because the
narrator has properly prepped us for Magnolia, has intimated not only that
mixed-up stuff can all come together into something wonderful, sometimes,
but that it's going to happen here. What the preface does is function as a
seductive admonition to pay attention, to not dismiss each scene as it fades
from the screen but to keep it in mind with all the others, to weigh them
the same until you know where and how they go, to hold them in some buffer
portion of your mind until they can all be applied, at once. That'll be the
rush (incidentally, this kind of rush also qualifies for the strict
definition of 'catharsis'--letting out all the emotions at once, only here,
those emotions are fabricated within the movie, by the movie, not something
you bring to the theater yourself). Magnolia quietly promises such a rush,
promises that all these random goings-on will eventually gel. Which puts us
into the position to attempt to anticipate when where and how they'll come
together.
Before it comes, though, that cathartic rush, those are the three of the
better hours in moviedom, simply because, as we've been allowing everything
the same weight, the same charge, the same level of meaning, and we suspect
that there is a lot of meaning here, it's just temporarily unapplied,
everything thus has the full meaning of Magnolia within it, in a potential
state. We don't know if Frank T.J. Mackey's (Tom Cruise) motivational
seminar is the key, if Officer Curring (John C. Reilly) losing his gun is
the key, if a dog eating a dying man's pills is the key, or what, so we
treat all of them as equally important, until we know better. And it's
refreshing to traffic in a reality like that, where everything's magic,
where everything means something, it's all interconnected. To see how it all
fits we just have to, as American Beauty suggests, look closer.
As close as you look, however, still, just when you think you've got it all
figured out, you don't. And you couldn't have. Really. Seriously. Part of
you might feel it's unfair, but then the other part of you's caught up in
the thrill of it. The nearest approximation would have to be in Fisher King,
when all the train-station people lock arms and start dancing, but this is
better, has that same meaningful feel as the cafe-robbery in Pulp Fiction,
only everything's in sequence here, and nobody's screaming and shooting etc.
I would say Magnolia is the most original movie in a long time, only we're
just coming off American Beauty, Being John Malkovich. Suffice it to say
that, as American Beauty and Being John Malkovich do, Magnolia also raises
the standard, and raises it quite a bit. It's to cinema as Sixth Sense was
to horror. And, like it or not, you do take that same mode of perception it
requires with you, out of the theater, if only for a while. You don't look
at something for three hours and then just look away, after all. And, in
Magnolia's case, you don't really even want to look away in the first place.
(c)2000 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten
 New Line Cinema
 Director: Paul Thomas Anderson
 Writer: Paul Thomas Anderson
 Cast: William H. Macy, Julianne Moore, Tom Cruise, Jason
Robards, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Jeremy Blackman,
Michael Bowen, Philip Baker Hall, Melora Walters, John C.
Reilly, Melinda Dillon, Emmanuel Johnson, Miriam Margolyes,
Luis Guzman
   "I am the master of my fate/ I am the captain of my soul,"
said the poet William Ernest Henley back in 1888, to which
some of us, having witnessed some mighty irrational
occurrences during this century, would cynically reply, "Ha!"  
Are we indeed creatures whose use of free will can make or
break us? Of are we mere bondsmen to our real overlords
and rulers, the vagaries of life--namely chance, accidents,
coincidences, and our own past?
  In Paul Thomas Anderson's vision, we are like puppets on
strings, manipulated by Divine Will, flukes, happenstance,
societal norms, and driven at times to near-insanity by the
afflictions of our own past.  Anderson's previous film, "Boogie
Nights," re-created an extended family of pornographers in
California's San Fernando Valley from the late seventies to
the early eighties, centering on an alienated teen (Mark
Wahlberg) who is made into a porn star.  Like "Magnolia,"
that creation of the twenty-eight-year-old director features
flamboyant cinematography, a garish production design, and
some gritty shots of the California landscape that could give a
foreigner watching the film the impression that with few
exceptions, the whole state houses no less than an
anguished collection of guilt-ridden, media-obsessed,
coke-snorting, manipulating, erratic, unloved and
unloving freaks.  What a panorama of personalities to exploit
for the making of a bold, imaginative, envelope-pushing
movie!  Fellini would shape his material to suit his neeeds:
Anderson does so his way.
   Anderson deliberately and happily does not try to shape his
epic-length story into a timeless classic that could be suitably
viewed and enjoyed by people a century from now. Though
we do see the family dysfunction that had fired the fancy of
the Greeks and Elizabethans, "Magnolia" spotlights a
particular place with a unique lifestyle--California's San
Fernando Valley--just as Anderson had centered on the
characteristic environment of L.A. in "Boogie Nights" and on
Nevada in "Hard Eight."  While the pornographers of "Boogie
Nights" plied their trade with little embarrassment, however,
many of the folks in "Magnolia" are overwhelmed with
feelings of guilt for their transgressions, spiritually dried up
and dying for their inability to give or receive love.  But
like Dirk, the stud at the core of the 1997 film, the
characters in the current work try to compensate for the put-
downs and abuse suffered at the hands of their parents in
odd, but often futile, ways.
   If the porno scene of "Boogie Nights" was a reflection of
the greedy 1980s, the rootless nineties forms the backdrop of
"Magnolia."  More people in America are living alone than
ever before, many subsisting on the meager rewards of
watching TV, attending support groups (like the guys in David
Fincher's "Fight Club"), engaging in meaningless, recreational
sex, and filling their bodies with harmful substances--the
drugs which, we are told, are being consumed in place of the
hugs we should be receiving.  Anderson frames the story with
some faux-historical clips to demonstrate the workings of
chance and coincidence on our lives, the first frames actually
taken with a century-old Pathe camera to evoke a feeling of
authenticity.  From there, cinematographer Robert Elswit joins
with editor Dylan Tichenor to create Altmanesque short cuts
which capture the goings-on of a small group of Californians,
occurrences which at first seem absolutely unrelated but
which, in fact, are interwoven.  All events in the movie take
place during a single, striking 24-hour period, all bolstering
the cogent expression, "What a difference a day makes."
   Each of the principals in this character-driven tale
possesses a solid, distinct personality.  The most flamboyant
is Frank Mackey, who is played by Tom Cruise in a role
unlike any other he has rendered.  On the surface, Mackey is
an arrogant, successful leader of a male support group who
prances confidently before expensive seminars teaching his
devotees how to seduce women--how to be the in-charge guy
who is irresistible to the opposite sex.  One of the chapters in
his study manuals is: "How to fake that you are a caring
person."  He is estranged from his 65-year-old dad, Earl
Partridge (Jason Robards), the producer of a quiz show who
is quickly and painfully dying of cancer and wants only to see
his son before he goes. Partridge's much younger wife, Linda
(Julianne Moore), has been driven into a frenzy by guilt over
her relationship with her husband, while most of the principals
are either similarly awash with overwhelming regrets for their
past deeds or unhappy products of ill treatment they received
from people they had trusted.
   "Magnolia," which gets its title from Mark Bridges and
Williams Arnold's production design--the greens, browns and
off-whites of the flower, the colors deepening as the
characters grow to understand their motivations--will probably
not enjoy the popular appeal of the more vigorous "Boogie
Nights."  Anderson's loosely constructed script requires more
patience from the audience, which may be too eager to
discover the connections among these diverse personalities
and are left hanging for quite a while before locating the
director's aims and understanding his vision.  Nor does
"Magnolia" enjoy the level of humor that Anderson rouses in
his previous script.  While Alfred Molina is his usual
exuberant self this time around, we miss the side-splitting
shtick of two years ago when he portrayed an easy-going
fellow who just wants to party throughout the day.  
   Rarely before has a film utilized its soundtrack in the
pulsating style of "Magnolia."  Aimee Mann's songs are every
bit a character, their palpitating tones punctuating all aspects
of the story--particularly the final strain in which everyone
joins, dead and living alike.  Mark Bridges's costumes
symbolize the camouflage behind which we all hide our truer,
darker personalities, most pointedly the expensive
outfits worn by Linda Partridge to hide her inner
impoverishment.  Some particularly arresting roles are played
by young Jeremy Blackman as Stanley, the love-starved boy
genius who sings part of a "Carmen" aria to win points on a
quiz show m.c.'d by first-class phony Jimmy Gator (Philip
Baker Hall), and by William H. Macy as a former boy
genius so messed up by his parents that he winds up a near
basket case thinking that orthodontia could bring him love.
   Though there is cause for optimism as "Magnolia"'s
personalities come to grips with their psyches, making
amends sometimes successfully, sometimes fruitlessly, and in
one case disastrously, Anderson's concept is a bleak one.  If
his country continues on its current, rootless path, ignoring
the obligations and joys of family connection and healthy
relationships with friends and associates, California and the
other alienated centers of America are in for a cataclysmic
disaster.  We could perhaps suffer even the Divine
punishment which Anderson so boldly and surrealistically
splashes across the screen toward the movie's conclusion, a
punishment that recalls God's harsh treatment of the
Egyptian pharaoh who would not let his enslaved people go.
Rated R.  Running Time: 195 minutes.  (C) 1999
Harvey Karten, film_critic@compuserve.com

Author
Mac VerStandig
---A copy of this review can be found at 
http://www.moviereviews.org/magnolia.htm ---
---Those of you in the Portland, Maine are can hear Mac VerStandig's 
movie reviews every Friday morning on 98.9 The Point radio.---
Despite opening with footage of old black and white 16 millimeter film, 
Magnolia quickly splices away from many time-revered filmmaking 
fundamentals and bravely ventures into cutting-edge territory. In that 
sense, the film is a true first effort and, like many freshman attempts, 
the end-product is only semi-interesting but extremely noteworthy 
because of the boundaries it crosses.
The film, however, isn't director P. T. Anderson's initial voyage into 
Hollywood. He previously achieved momentary fame with the critically 
acclaimed but Academy-snubbed Boogie Nights. Many of the cast and crew 
members from that 1997 effort join him again here. He re-embraces a 
similar filmmaking style in Magnolia, but those that think Boogie Nights 
was as new-age as they could handle, will likely struggle through this 
production.
A dying father, woman at his side, a nurse taking care of him, a quiz 
show host, a well-intentioned cop, a coke-sniffing daughter, a former 
quiz show champion, a current quiz show champion and a sex-craving 
instructor of "Seduce and Destroy" courses. Throw in some men at the 
gallows, Hustler magazine and a mind-boggling biblical reference and all 
the pieces fit together as in a very fragile jig saw puzzle. But don't 
dare blink, because the one major connecting piece is quick, quiet and 
very subtle. It is trying to connect those pieces that is the film's 
plot. 
Not only does the movie venture outside the lines with the 
aforementioned unconventional plot, but the actual filmmaking technique 
used by P. T. Anderson might give some Tisch professors nightmares. The 
supposedly unbreakable 180 degree rule, which states that no cut should 
be made in one scene that jumps more than 180 degrees, is flagrantly 
ignored. Ditto the concept of never intentionally cutting off someone's 
head in the frame while they are talking. Yet the most shocking 
violation comes when Anderson uses shaky handheld footage, a technique 
normally only utilized when absolutely necessary, voluntarily.
In front of the camera is a rather impressive cast including Jason 
Robards, Philip Baker Hall, Philip Seymour Hoffman, William H. Macy, 
Julianne Moore and John C. Reilly. But the real treat is Tom Cruise who 
ventures into this film having just played a sex-craving New Yorker in 
legendary director Stanley Kubrick's last movie, Eyes Wide Shut. Here he 
is a sex preaching Californian whose in-your-face course includes 
lessons like "How to fake like you are nice and caring." (I would list 
more, but this is a family website.) Cruise will likely finally get an 
Oscar for this film in the form of Best Supporting Actor, after his 
previously being snubbed in the lead actor category for films like Born 
on the Fourth of July and Jerry Maguire.
I am told that P. T. Anderson's director's cut of this movie was five 
hours long. I have little doubt that those 300 minutes of footage are 
boldly original and might fascinate hardcore film junkies. But to most, 
the movie will lose steam after about two hours in its current three 
hour state. Although its too early to tell, P. T. Anderson could 
ultimately end up leading a filmmaking revolution in Hollywood. Lets 
hope he doesn't cure insomnia in the process.  

Author
greg king
MAGNOLIA (M).  
(New Line Cinema/Village Roadshow)
Director: Paul Thomas Anderson
Stars: Jeremy Blackman, Tom Cruise, Melinda Dillon, Philip Baker Hall,
Philip Seymour Hoffman, William H Macy, Julianne Moore, John C Reilly,
Jason Robards, Melora Walters, Henry Gibson, Michael Bowen, April
Grace, Luiz Guzman, Ricky Jay, Orlando James, Alfred Molina, Michael
Murphy, Felicity Huffman, Emmanuel L Johnson, Don McManus, Eileen
Ryan, Danny Wells, Brad Hunt, Cory Buck, Thomas Jane 
Running time: 188 minutes.
        Paul Thomas Anderson's follow up to his amazing Boogie Nights
is an extraordinary, ambitious yet slightly flawed masterpiece that
tackles some important themes.  Magnolia explores how chance,
coincidence and random occurrences can play a large part in shaping
our lives, and how the past impacts on the present.  Anderson also
deals with larger themes of death, forgiveness, and reconciliation.
Another common thread running through the film explores the
psychological damage that fathers can, both knowingly and unknowingly,
inflict on their children.
The action of this sprawling pseudo-epic takes place over the
course of one inclement day in Los Angeles and follows nine principal
characters, whose lives are inexorably linked.
Dying millionaire Earl Partridge (Jason Robards) wants to
affect a final reconciliation with his estranged son (Tom Cruise).
His wife (Julianne Moore), who initially married him for his money, is
now tormented by her callousness and desperately seeks forgiveness.
Other characters who play an important role in the drama unfolding
include Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall) a genial television quiz show
host with a dark secret that has scarred his cocaine sniffing daughter
Claudia (Melora Walters); Donnie Smith (William H Macy), a former
child genius who has trouble coping with the adult world, his faded
fame and his uncertain sexuality; and Jim Kurring (John C Reilly), an
incompetent but basically decent cop who falls in love with the
troubled and lonely Claudia.
An inexplicable phenomenon becomes the ultimate catalyst for
change, redemption, reconciliation, salvation, and a new beginning for
many of the characters.
Anderson is a wonderful and perceptive writer, with insight
into his flawed characters and the vagaries of human nature.  Some of
the confrontations and intimate conversations between the various
characters are revealing but uncomfortable.  Cinematographer and
regular collaborator Robert Elswit often works in close-up, which is
often intimidating and uncomfortable, especially in wide screen, but
somehow adds to the intimacy of many key scenes.  But the camera
fluidly weaves in and out of the various narrative strands, bringing
the stories to life.
The characters are beautifully brought to life by the
performances of the ensemble cast, many a familiar part of Anderson's
regular repertory company.  The standout performance comes from
Cruise, largely cast against type as a misogynistic, self-proclaimed
self-help guru who empowers men in their difficult relationships with
women.  He is electrifying, and this ranks as one of his best
performances.  Moore is hysterically overwrought and shrill as
Partridge's younger wife, and her uncharacteristically uneven
performance occasionally grates.  Philip Seymour Hoffman (recently
seen in The Talented Mr Ripley) delivers a sympathetic performance as
Partridge's devoted male nurse, one of the few constantly likeable
characters in the whole film.
Although working on a vastly broader canvas than previously,
Anderson directs the material with the same assurance he demonstrated
on Boogie Nights.  He pulls the various strands together with a
clarity that has lately eluded Robert Altman, the past master of this
sort of complex mosaic, and deftly constructed interlocking
multi-layered narrative.  However, the pacing is a little too languid
at times, and there are many moments throughout that misfire
awkwardly.  The early sequences introduce us to the story and the
myriad characters effectively enough, but the film tends to lose its
way a little in the middle.
Like most three hour movies, Magnolia is overlong and self
indulgent.  There are several scenes that could have been trimmed and
tightened, without diluting Anderson's themes or lessening its
devastating emotional impact.

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Paul Thomas Anderson.
Cast: John C. Reilly, Melora Walters, Philip Baker Hall, Tom Cruise, Jason 
Robards, Julianne Moore, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Jeremy Blackman, William H. 
Macy, Melinda Dillon, April Grace, Michael Bowen, Alfred Molina, Ricky Jay, 
Felicity Huffman, Luis Guzman, Emmanuel Johnson, Henry Gibson, Miguel Perez, 
Brad Hunt, Jim Beaver.
1999 - 195 minutes
Rated R (for violence, profanity, brief sex, and nudity).
Reviewed by Dustin Putman, January 8, 1999.
"Magnolia" is a mind-blowing masterpiece of a movie--heavy in drama, intense 
emotional material, characters, and underlying themes. At 195 minutes (that 
would be 3 hours 15 minutes), the film is a sprawling artistic triumph, 
displaying an amount of downright shocking originality and vigor that very 
few films ever hope to obtain. What I can't, nor never could attempt to 
explain, is how such an overwhelmingly ambitious, effortlessly fabricated 
motion picture could be made by a director who is 29-years-old and is only on 
his third film (the other two being the 1997 double-header, "Hard Eight" and 
"Boogie Nights," both of which are among the best films of that respective 
year). I'll never know his secret, but Anderson can now surely and without a 
doubt be named the most exciting and fresh filmmaker working today, a genius 
for the ages.
Only artificially resembling a Robert Altman ensemble picture (1975's 
"Nashville," 1993's "Short Cuts"), but acquiring a storytelling approach and 
technical style all its own, "Magnolia" is unlike anything I've seen before, 
and when you can assuredly say that, you really know the film at hand is, 
undoubtedly, a unique one. 
After an attention-getting prologue, in which three stories are briefly told 
that concern chance and coincidence, like rapid-fire we immediately are 
thrown into a whirlwind of characters whom we will then follow over a 24-hour 
period in the San Fernando Valley. Most are related to each other in some 
way, which we discover as the film progresses. Kicking things off is Jim 
Kurring (John C. Reilly), a truthful, religious police officer who is very 
lonely and looking for love. After traveling to an apartment building whose 
one resident has complained about the overly loud music and yelling coming 
from next door, Jim is immediately struck by the beautiful, but obviously 
somehow distraught young woman, Claudia Wilson Gator (Melora Walters). Both 
are attracted to each other right away, but little does he know that Claudia 
is a cocaine addict, and the ruckus came from her yelling at her estranged 
father, Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall), who had dropped by earlier to tell 
her he just found out he has cancer and only has a few months to live. Jimmy 
Gator is a television host for the popular game show, "What Do Kids Know?," 
and as this particular episode proceeds during the evening, Jimmy is startled 
to discover that he is deteriorating faster than he thought, much to the 
distress of his wife, Rose (Melinda Dillon). 
One of the reigning whiz kid contestants is Stanley Spector (Jeremy Blackman) 
who, as the night progresses, realizes that everyone, including his gruff 
father (Michael Bowen), is treating him like an object, or an encyclopedia, 
when all he wants is to be looked at as an average kid. Back in the 1960s, 
the most publicized whiz kid for the show was Donnie Smith (William H. Macy), 
who still lives in the same city, but has just learned that he is about to be 
fired from his job at a furniture store. Excited about getting corrective 
teeth surgery, it is soon discovered that Donnie simply longs to be like the 
one he is in love with, a handsome, buff bartender (Brad Hunt) who has braces 
himself. 
As the game show wears on during the early hours of the night, being filmed 
on another cable station across town is sex guru Frank T.J. Mackey (Tom 
Cruise), a male chauvinist pig whose motto is "Seduce and Destroy." During an 
interview with a female reporter (April Grace) between the break of the show, 
Frank falsely states that his father is dead and has a positive relationship 
with his mother. In actuality, as a child, he was left to care for his ill 
mother while his father, the wealthy Earl Partridge (Jason Robards), left 
them and ended up marrying the much younger Linda (Julianne Moore). Now Earl 
is in the last stages of cancer, and as Linda grows more and more conflicted 
and guilty about getting the money in his will (she doesn't want it because 
she originally married him for his riches, but now has truly grown to love 
him), Earl's nurse, Phil Parma (Philip Seymour Hoffman), has been trying to 
reach Frank through the impossible hotline of his show, so that they might 
possibly be able to reconcile before his death.
Sort of like 1999's exciting German film, "Run Lola Run," "Magnolia" seems to 
always be on the move from one destination to the next, with the difference 
being that the latter picture actually has a noticeable amount of substance 
to match its liberatingly flashy style. For much of the film, the camera 
rarely stops moving, but it is not done in a way that becomes annoying or 
hints of hurried editing. Instead, like Anderson's previous "Boogie Nights," 
"Magnolia" is a motion picture alive and well, with energy to spare, and a 
clear and bold signification of the pure love for the art of moviemaking.
Intriguing is the way that certain things might happen, and then the next 
scene will go back in time to when the previous scene was occurring, and 
simply follow a different character. This can be detected most easily when 
the day slowly edges towards night, and in one scene it will be dark, while 
in the next the evening will only be approaching. Not only is P.T. Anderson 
(as he likes to be called) a marvelous director, but his writing matches it 
in every way. The screenplay, which is known to have been sparked not only 
from a collection of ideas that Anderson then interweaved together, but also 
in the 9 songs that singer Aimee Mann has contributed to the picture, is one 
that very well could have been uneven, since a couple stories are usually 
bound to be more interesting than others, but this does not happen this time. 
Every character and each one of their lives is sympathetically brought to 
vibrant life, and because of its highly appropriate three-hour-plus length, 
enough time is spent with each central individual to get to know, understand, 
and care about them.
Aimee Mann's songs have been previously remarked as being one of the film's 
very own characters, and I couldn't agree more. They are beautiful pieces of 
musical art on their own, and each one has its rightful purpose in the 
picture, especially in the extremely fitting places that Anderson has placed 
them. A tour de force sequence that is certainly one of the most brilliantly 
heartbreaking moments in any film from 1999, Aimee Mann's quiet "Wise Up," 
filled with equal measures of hope and utter despair, begins to play on the 
soundtrack, and each character, no matter where they are, sings a couple 
verses of the song. The outcome is extraordinarily powerful and an 
approximately five-minute stretch of film that will never be forgotten.
Anderson has a way with casting the best actors in the biz, and then pulling 
superior work out of them, and "Magnolia" is no exception. Across the board, 
the performances are astounding, and they all work so perfectly together, in 
the context of the film, that no one could be pin-pointed as being better 
than the next. Worth noting, though, is John C. Reilly's earnest Jim Kurring; 
Jeremy Blackman's impressive turn as young Stanley Spector; Philip Baker 
Hall, as Jimmy Gator, the game show host at battle with himself, and with his 
recently discovered cancer; Julianne Moore's poignant and misunderstood Linda 
Partridge; Jason Robard's fully accurate portrayal of the cancer-stricken 
Earl Partridge; Melora Walter's internally struggling, drug-addicted Claudia 
Gator; and Philip Seymour Hoffman's sincere, caring Phil Parma. Tom Cruise, 
although no better than anyone else, should be individually mentioned for 
taking on such a brave, admirable supporting role, as Frank T.J. Mackey. 
Never has Cruise had such a wildly diverse character as the one he has been 
gifted with here, and his only misstep at all comes in his final tearful 
scene, which is slightly overplayed. It's also a welcome change of pace to 
see the return of the underrated Melinda Dillon, who has virtually 
disappeared from the movie radar in recent years, but is touching and 
effective as Rose, Jimmy Gator's suspicious, grief-stricken wife.
Everyone in "Magnolia" is inevitably leading up to a certain moment in time, 
one which has less to do with what is going to happen to them, since their 
lives are already reaching a crossroad that many will fail at and not be able 
to cross, and more to do with the way chance and coincidence can change a 
person's whole life forever. Although I have been outraged to discover that 
the surprising ending has been discussed in detail in certain reviews, there 
is no way I would dare give it away for those who haven't been fortunate 
enough to see this luminous motion picture. Suffice to say, what does happen 
may appear to come right out of left field, but there are clues throughout 
the film, and I think what it symbolizes is the way that the characters' 
decisions and choices that they have made in their lifetimes are crushing 
down and squeezing the life out of them, to the point where there is nowhere 
left for them to go. While what happens destroys some people's lives even 
further, it also ultimately brings other characters together, and the final 
scene is one filled with a grand, incomparable sense of hope and happiness. 
"Magnolia" is surely a one-of-a-kind experience. It's difficult to fathom 
that Anderson could ever make another film as great as this one, but who 
knows? After seeing the enormous amount of talent he has, there's no doubt in 
my mind that he will continue to surprise, delight, and challenge his 
audiences well into the 21st Century. 

Author
Scott Hunt
review by Scott Hunt. Visit me at Movie Hunt  
http://netdirect.net/~hunt/index.html
Director: Paul Thomas Anderson
Cast: Tom Cruise, Julianne Moore, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Jason Robards,
Willim H. Macy, Melora Walters, John C. Reilly, Phillip Baker Hall,
Jeremy Blackman 
Magnolia left me relling from the theatre, staggering from the
relentless assault of an adventurous director reveling in his craft. At
nearly three and a half hours, Magnolia will strike some as a brute of a
film. It not only demands your attention, but challenges you to grasp
the significance of seemingly unrelated storylines and hidden
intentions. It is delirious, depressing, heady, pretentious, surreal
filmmaking. It's also a movie that will polarize its viewers.
Director Paul Thomas Anderson takes a talented cast, wraps them in a net
of interrelated stories and sets them spinning in a symphony of despair
whose song doesn't let up until an oddly exhilerating, biblically
influenced pseudo-climax. The character's make up a modern day Gomorrah
in the soulless way in which they live their lives. There is Frank
Mackey (Tom Cruise), a slithery snake charmer of men whose "Search and
Destroy" seminars teach how to mentally rape a woman to get into her
pants. There is Earl Partridge (Jason Robards), a dying media tycoon
yearning to make amends for a lfe of callousness by finding his
estranged son. There is game show host Jimmy Gator (Phillip Baker Hall),
a self absorbed TV icon who is hiding more than a few secrets from his
public. And there is police officer Jim Kurring (John C. Reilly), who
cloaks himself in the codification of organized religion and the legal
system, perhaps masking a man who needs rules to fuel his decision
making process.
Given equal weight are stories involving a coke-addled emotional cripple
(Melora Walters), a former TV quiz show champion (William H. Macy). a
materialistic, adulterous wife (Julianne Moore), a child (Jeremy
Blackman) victimized by a mentally abusive parent, and a caring,
empathetic nurse (Philip Seymour Hoffman). Hovering over all these
characters is a cloud of death, lies and despair. It is not a pleasant
movie.
There is not one bad note in the acting. It is affecting and layered and
wonderful. There is a moment where Tom Cruise wordlessly implodes that
rivals work he has done in whole films. Then he tops himself with a
mesmerizing deathbed scene. Walters plays her character with red-eyed
rawness and a fierce self-destructiveness that is anxiety inducing.
Robards convincingly portrays a fading whisper of a man, who still hears
a lion's roar when he speaks. Director Anderson has apparently given the
actors lattitude to emote. The problem is that he stays on them too
long. Julianne Moore's character, Linda, quickly escalates to a frenzied
pitch of guilt, tears, screaming and remorse and never backs  off from
it. After a few hours, it turns from interesting to chinese water
torture. Quite a few scenes, such as the game show, go on just a bit too
long and will be off-putting for those used to a pat 90 minute film
where the main theme is reiterated several times just in case you missed
it the first go around.
And just what is the theme? Alienation? Hopelessness? Anderson
challenges you to draw your own conclusions and he doesn't make it easy.
The film starts by showing three, strange and seemingly unrelated
events. It's a harbinger of the synchronicity to come. At times,
different stories reach reach key moments at the same time. Other times,
stories seem to veer off into uncharted territory, regardless of what
else is happening. Anderson is audacious enough to even have a group
sing in the middle of the film! What's surprising is that it mostly
works. If you have doubts about Anderson's intentions, I'll ask you to
pay attention to the final frame. Despite all the Sturm und Drang,
Magnolia ultimately speaks to man's capacity for hope and attempts at
redemption.
Despite Magnolia's needlessly long running time and its propensity for
uneven editing as Anderson plays the auteur, showing off fro the masses,
I have to admire his guts. This is truly adventurous filmmaking that
spits in the face of conventional storytelling.
My rating: A Bulleye. (4 out of 4 stars)
A side note: Helping anchor the film is a perfectly matched soundtrack
featuring Aimee Mann. Her lyrics often add depth to a scene thematically
while the actual music is both morose and beautiful. When she sings
"Save Me" at the end, it enhances the yearning felt by the characters,
just as "Wise Up" mirrors the anguish felt by all as they contemplate
their lives.

Author
Lars Lindahl
Starring Phillip Baker Hall, Melora Walters, John C. Reilly, Melinda Dillon,
Philip Seymour Hoffman, Jason Robards, Tom Cruise, Julianne Moore, Jeremy
Blackman, Michael Bowen,  William H. Macy, Ricky Jay, Henry Gibson, Felicity
Huffman, and Luis Guzman.
The film "Magnolia" can be compared to a simple flower as its title and movie
poster suggests. The dozens of characters introduced and developed are like the
petals on the flower. They all come from the same stem and as the flower begins
to develop they grow farther and farther apart. The numerous characters in the
film are all closely connected no matter how different they are from one
another socially. From a humiliated but kind cop to an aging game show host,
each one of these characters is suffering the same kind of pain. They are each
seriously lonely and seek the perfect companion to end this loneliness. Whether
this companion is a distant family member or a spouse, each character begs for
one and spends the whole film searching for the perfect one. 
"Magnolia" is a clever, well thought out film from prodigy director-writer Paul
Thomas Anderson of "Boogie Nights" fame. The detailed character analyses and
the powerful script make "Magnolia" memorable.  However, what really is
impressive is that even though there are tons of characters in several
unrelated stories, the film is never confusing. Anderson's control over
transitioning from one story to another story is masterful. He also knows
exactly when to cut to another subplot since not one of "Magnolia's" scenes
drag on too long. Any three hour film that does not deliver even one
uninteresting scene is definitely worth recommending. From the fascinating
beginning to the risky yet surprisingly satisfying ending the film just doesn't
get boring.  It is obvious that Anderson put a lot of time into connecting each
subplot. This is the ultimate game of six degrees of separation. Every
character is connected to every other character by at the most two degrees. For
example, cop John C. Reilly is connected to game show host Phillip Baker Hall
through Hall's daughter Melora Walters who once went on a date with Reilly. The
fact that each character is so different from the others yet so similar shows
that there are universal pains that all classes, races, and genders suffer.
Anderson's explanation to prove this point is both accurate and convincing. The
only mistake Anderson made in trying to connect his characters was by making
his actors all sing an Aimee Mann song simultaneously. This was foolish not
only because it was unbelievable and hilariously erroneous but also because it
had a Broadway musical feel to it and this movie is about as far apart from
your typical Broadway musical than you can get.
The performances in "Magnolia" are perfection. This is a classic example of
flawless casting and flawless ensemble acting. Anderson allows many of
Hollywood's best supporting actors to blossom at what they do best, character
acting. All of the main characters in each story are perfect because they are
able to reveal more emotions and attitudes in their brief time on the screen
then most movie stars can do in a feature length film. Worth noting is Tom
Cruise, who stepped out of his usual superficial starring role and into a funny
but depressing tour de force performance. He was probably noticed more than the
other actors in the film by award givers because his role here is so much
different and impressive than those in the past (however any actor in this film
could be nominated for best supporting actor without any complaints) The only
problem I had with the acting was that a few of the characters felt seriously
edited down such as Melinda Dillon's character as Phillip Baker Hall's wife.
She seemed to be thrown in towards the end and I felt very little sympathy for
her because I had not seen her enough earlier in the film.
"Magnolia" uses several effective metaphors to describe its characters.
Anderson has the talent to make the audience sympathetic towards numerous
people in only a few hours. To see that Anderson is able to perfectly portray
this many different types of people shows that he has a keen sense of
diversity. Diversity is what makes a director successful for a long period of
time. I predict a lot of diversity and success from Anderson in the future.

Author
Walter Frith
'Hard Eight' and 'Boogie Nights'.  1996 and 1997 were good years for
director Paul Thomas Anderson.  Two films that established him as a hard
boiled and progressive film maker.  His influential style, that of a young
Robert Altman, was breath taking to behold.  Particularly 'Boogie Nights'.
A film which spanned six years and gave us an evenly balanced look at
several characterizations and the film knew where its high points and low
points were.  The decibel level was right on the money.  My, how things
change.  'Magnolia' is an over stuffed stinker that reeks with pretentious
situations and over written scenes of ulcerating ugliness.  It does this
from its opening scene and tries to explain that co-incidence and
unlikeliness are the most bizarre facts of life
The most depressing film I've ever seen is 1998's 'Affliction'.  Superb
acting from all (including James Coburn's Oscar win for Best Supporting
Actor) but the film had a strange and curious path of familiarity for many
families and the picture concentrated itself on the actions of only a few
major characters.  I said in my review that while being truthful, that
didn't seem to matter much because the overall purpose of film is to
entertain and I questioned the entertainment value of such a film and a
similarly depressing film from 1998 entitled 'A Simple Plan' which suffered
from the same fate and while  recommending that film, I like it less and
less the more I think about it.  I had to debate for almost a week and
finally gave 'Affliction' a marginal recommendation for its stain of genuine
emotional truth.
'Magnolia' also makes the mistake of trying to bombard the screen with too
much over the top material that it loses track of its entertainment value.
The film is like being grabbed by an octopus and pulled in so many
directions that you're exhausted after finally escaping, the equivalent of
leaving the theatre for movie goers.  Leaving 'Magnolia' is indeed an escape
rather than a departure.  The film's glib symmetry will be mistaken by some
as high powered drama but it suffers from an ending which goes against the
first rule of screen writing.  I call it the 'red herring' factor.  A final
scene that is out of left field with no warning given to the audience and is
a ridiculous and cheap way to end all it thinks its accomplished.
The story is an ensemble piece that shows the lives of about a dozen
characters, some of whom aren't worth mentioning because their scenes are so
one dimensional.  Senior to the film is Jason Robards, a dying man named
Earl Partridge who is trying to contact his long lost son Frank (Tom Cruise)
who has changed his last name to Mackey and wants nothing to do with the
dying spirit of his father after being contacted by Earl's home care worker
(Philip Seymour Hoffman).  Frank Mackey is a kind of manipulative
motivational speaker.  He tries to expand other men's horizons in the sexual
universe by telling them what sex really is and how to use it to get members
of the opposite gender to fall immediately for them.  His seminars come
complete with a spotlight, head set microphone and flashy wardrobe.  Some
good work here by Cruise, but I hope the members of the Academy don't give
him an Oscar for it.  If they do, it will be in part, a sympathy vote to
compensate Cruise for the ridiculous amount of time he spent making 'Eyes
Wide Shut'.  Sure, a great film in the end and one of the best of 1999 but a
film that could have been made in only a few months.  Earl Partridge is also
filled with regret for marrying an uncaring and unloving woman named Linda
(Julianne Moore).  A neurotic, maniacal female who hates her step son Frank.
Meet Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall).  He is the host of a game show where a
group of kids on one side, take on a group of adults on the other and all
the trappings of the game show world are explored in such a manner as to
leave the most foul taste in your mouth after it's all over.  Jimmy is dying
and only has a couple of months left to live and tries to make amends with
his wife (Melinda Dillon) and his drug addicted daughter (Melora Walters),
who is about to warm up to a police officer (John C. Reilly).  Then there is
the most boring of the stories involving a former child genius (William H.
Macy) as a loser who works at a job he is too overqualified for.  Was
William H. Macy trying to top himself by playing a loser similar to the one
he played in his Oscar nominated role in 'Fargo'.  You won't top that one,
Billy!
What is most shocking about 'Magnolia' is how it uses its music score.  The
music literally goes on for so long that it obliterates the senses and
doesn't know when to quit.  The audience I saw it with was stone faced
throughout its ridiculous running time of three hours and gasps of shock and
disbelief hit the auditorium during the unlikely climax.  What little there
is to rave about in some of the performances, notably Cruise and Reilly, is
drowned out by a protracted chemistry among its cast and is comparable to
having one of your teeth pulled without anesthetic and then needing all of
your teeth removed because your dentist fouled up.  In other words, the film
sets off a chain reaction of dreariness you won't recover from anytime soon
and you won't even care about its characters when it's all said and done.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Gary Jones
Magnolia is writer-director Paul Thomas Anderson's follow-up to Boogie
Nights. This time, Anderson has come over all Robert Altman, resisting
traditional notions of narrative and instead taking a huge cast of
characters and weaving together a series of vaguely interconnected
stories, some of which come to a resolution of sorts, others of which
are left dangling. Story hardly seems to matter in this swirling mix of
rejection, death, loneliness, coercion, unfulfilled promise, abandonment
and coincidence.
The film has a cast to die for, and includes particularly good
performances from Jason Robards, who plays a dying man and looks really
very ill indeed, Phillip Seymour Hoffman (surely Hollywood's new
superstar among character actors) as Robards's nurse, and John C. Reilly
as a lonely cop. There are, though, a couple of disappointments from
usually excellent actors. William H. Macy plays an ineffectual man
turned bungling criminal and gives what is little more than a reprise of
his performance in Fargo, and Julianne Moore plays a character so whiney
and unstable that she descends from being merely unconvincing and
laughable to being positively annoying. Perhaps surprisingly, given the
acting talent on show, the standout performance is given by Tom Cruise,
who has never been better. All teeth and flashing eyes, he plays a
motivational guru promoting his monstrous Seduce and Destroy program for
predatory males. Cruise excels as he repels, explaining to his whooping
followers that he is about to show them "how to fake being kind and
caring". Later, when an interviewer offends him with a line of
questioning about his family background, the smile fades and he grows
silent. "What are you doing?" she asks. "I'm quietly judging you," he
replies. I have always had my suspicions that Stanley Kubrick's methods
were not suited to getting the best out of actors. All that time locked
away making Eyes Wide Shut and at the end of it Cruise was middling at
best. Here he is simply terrific, and all credit to him for taking this
part in an ensemble piece, rather than just signing up for more obvious
star-vehicles such as Mission: Impossible 2.
Technically, Magnolia, is big-budget American indie at its best and is
beautifully photographed by Robert Elswit. Some haunting songs by Aimee
Mann feature in several key sequences, including an effective scene in
which we cut from one strand of the film to the next and see each of the
main characters singing along to the same melancholy song. In some
scenes, the songs are so high up in the sound mix that the dialogue is
virtually inaudible, suggesting that the lyrics have more to say than
the characters. The opening pre-credits sequence, narrated by
actor/magician Ricky Jay, establishes the theme of meaningful
coincidence in people's lives, and is the best short film the Coen
brothers never made. This macabrely funny sequence, and the
magnificently bizarre meteorological conditions near the end of the
filmThis macabrely funny sequence, and the magnificently bizarre
meteorological conditions near the end of the film, are moments of light
relief in an otherwise pretty oppressive movie. (The strange climactic
weather event is a delightful surprise, although those with a detailed
knowledge of the Old Testament are given a couple of clues to what's
coming.)
If I had my sarcastic cynic head on, I might suggest that Magnolia must
be important because it's over three hours long, and it must be profound
because it's so depressing. In a fairer mood, I'd say that although
Magnolia teeters on the edge of self-indulgence and pretension, it is
still an ambitious and impressive mosaic of failed and corrupt but
ultimately redeemable lives.
-- 
Gary Jones 
Homepage: www.bohr.demon.co.uk
PGP public key available from servers (DH/DSS key ID: 0x11EAE903)

Author
Jon Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY: http://www.sick-boy.com
I'm not even sure where to begin this review.  To attempt a description
of the plot in less than 5,000 words would be pointless  it's a
three-plus hour film that has separate storylines for each of its nine
main characters.  To heap praise on the acting would be a grave
understatement  a finer cast may not ever have been assembled.  To laud
the direction would be futile  it may be the best of the decade.
The film is Magnolia, writer/director Paul Thomas Anderson's
much-anticipated follow-up to Boogie Nights.  Here, Anderson has brought
back most of his Nights crew (both in front of and behind the camera)
and bumped up the complexity of his script to complement the eye-popping
beauty of his sweeping direction.  The result seems like Robert Altman's
structure combined with Martin Scorsese's visual flair.  It's almost too
much to take in during one viewing.  Anderson is brilliant on a
cinematic level that no other director has dared to even set foot.  He's
light years ahead of his counterparts and, if the progression of his
work is any indication, the twenty-nine-year-old will likely have a
mantle full of awards by the time he has his mid-life crisis.
Two of the biggest pleasures of Nights were its audacious opening (the
long tracking shot that went inside and outside a disco) and closing
scenes (where Mark Wahlberg finally revealed his `gift').  They're both
done better in Magnolia.  The film starts rather unconventionally, with
a narrator dizzily showing three detailed examples of how life is simply
a series of coincidences.  The ending is beyond explanation and would be
ruined if I were to try.  In between, the film is excruciatingly sad,
yet inexplicably beautiful.
Once Magnolia is finished with its initial setup of life's
unpredictability, viewers are quickly introduced to the main
characters.  And when I say `quickly,' brothers and sisters, I mean
quickly.  Before you can catch your breath, a third of the film has
already flown by.  Which is probably a good thing, on account of the
running time.  The pace gradually slows down as the film progresses, but
as the tempo diminishes, you can start to feel the pressure slowly
building in each of the characters and storylines.
The film is set in the San Fernando Valley and encompasses the nine
major characters during one rainy day in Southern California.  In fact,
most of the film takes place over a half-hour period.  There is a corny
cop (John C. Reilly, For Love of the Game), his cokehead love interest
(Melora Walters, L.A. Doctors), her game-show host father (Philip Baker
Hall, The Insider), his current and former whiz kid contestants
(newcomer Jeremy Blackman and Happy, Texas' William H. Macy,
respectively).  There's also the game show's producer (Jason Robards,
Beloved), his trophy wife (Julianne Moore, An Ideal Husband), estranged
son (Tom Cruise, Eyes Wide Shut) and home care nurse (Philip Seymour
Hoffman, Flawless).
To try to pick a center to Magnolia's story would be ludicrous.  There
isn't one.  There isn't a main character, either, and not all of the
roles intersect with each other.  Some do, but most don't.  Some
relationships between characters are implied but never shown during the
film.  The only similarity in each character is that they all are on the
run from their past, whether they realize it or not.  If anything,
Magnolia shows the effect of damaged relationships between fathers and
their children.  Each character is directly messed up as a result of
their paternal bonds.
Of the actors, Cruise will get the most attention.  He's the biggest
star and has the best lines (some of the greatest woman-hating dialogue
since Jason Patric in Your Friends and Neighbors).  Although Moore has
already been mentioned as a potential Oscar candidate, I found her role
to be a bit inferior to the others.  She's not bad, but her character
simply bursts into hysterics in every scene.  More impressive were
Robards, Reilly and Walters.  And Blackman and Hoffman.  And Hall.
Macy's character, while splendidly acted, did little to add to the rest
of the film.  If the role were missing, the film would not be affected.
But the real star here is Anderson, who glues together long, sweeping
takes with quick edits and unique camera angles to create a visual
masterpiece.  A lot of people will gripe about the running time, and
Anderson even has the gall to have a character piss their pants during
the two-hour mark of the film, as if to egg on viewers with weak
bladders.  Some people may find Jon Brion's (Anderson's Hard Eight)
score annoying, but I thought it was very well done, as well as a
perfect complement to Magnolia's songs, which are performed by Aimee
Mann.  At one point in the film, one of Mann's songs is performed by
each character in a karaoke music-video style that will certainly be
remembered as one of the greatest cinematic moments of the year.
3:05  R for strong adult language, drug use, nudity, sexual content and
graphic violence

Author
Bill Chambers
MAGNOLIA ***1/2 (out of four)
-a review by Bill Chambers (bill@filmfreakcentral.net)
starring Jason Robards, Julianne Moore, Tom Cruise, Philip Seymour
Hoffman
written and directed by Paul Thomas Anderson
Paul Thomas Anderson, hyphenate creator of Boogie Nights and the even
better Hard Eight, understands that chance encounters in movies, even
docudramas, never fly, so he braces you for the San Fernando Valley-set
Magnolia, his three hour ode to coincidence, with a dazzling prologue
that underlines the film's basic theme: "strange things happen." In
quick succession, Anderson, who goes by P.T. (evoking the name of a
certain ringleader), stages a 1911 murder, the death of a scuba-diving
casino dealer, and the homicide of a man in mid-suicide. The karmic
overtones of these three random acts of violence are absurd-we'd only
believe them in life if they were related to us in that reliable
fashion, "This friend of mine knows a guy who..."
A blaring TV announces the arrival of the story proper-all of Magnolia's
characters are at least peripherally connected with the television
trade. Game show producer Earl Patridge (Robards) is afflicted with
terminal cancer, as is Jimmy Gator (Phillip Baker Hall), the emcee of
his most popular program, "What Do Kids Know?". Earl's estranged son is
Frank T.J. Mackey (Cruise), a wildly successful host of seminars
("Seduce and Destroy") for sexually frustrated men. Jimmy's estranged
daughter is Claudia (Melora Walters), a sometime prostitute with a
fearsome coke habit.
Christian cop Jim Kurring (John C. Reilly) will eventually meet and
court Claudia. The police officer, like Donnie Smith (William H. Macy),
a former quiz show contestant, is at first an object of ridicule, an
earnest stumblebum given to bouts of transparent bravado. The two men
generate pathos when the truth of their shared loneliness comes to the
fore. ("I have so much love to give," Donnie wails. "I just don't know
where to put it.") Adolescent Stanley Spector (Jeremy Blackman) is the
image of Donnie at the height of his fame-the child is a reigning "What
Do Kids Know?" champion and, mainly due to pressure from his greedy,
boorish father (Michael Bowen), on the brink of a breakdown.
Finally, there are Earl's caretakers: Linda (Moore), his hysterical
trophy wife, and Phil Parma (Hoffman), a devoted nurse-he, too, is
single, sparing no love for anyone but Earl. The old man's last request
is a reunion with his only child, so Phil dutifully hangs on the phone
forever with Frank's handlers. Wryly echoing what was suggested by the
elaborate introduction, Phil tells an operator, "You know the scene [in
the movie] in which the dying man tries to get in touch with his
long-lost son?...There's a reason they have those scenes-because they
actually happen." (Regrettably, the film's prevalent black character, a
rappin' klepto, falls victim to stereotype.)
One gathers from watching the glorious pop mess that is Magnolia that
Anderson has cobbled together every stray idea that ever landed in his
imagination. The film includes a gut-wrenching corker of a musical
number in which the characters sing along, in divergent locales, to a
lyric from Aimee Mann's pseudo-inspirational "Wise Up". (Nine of Mann's
tunes adroitly grace the soundtrack.) While the film's aggressively
unpredictable bent makes room for such playfulness, it also paves the
way for an irksome climax-an unforeseen event, guaranteed to blindside
cold audiences, lets the air out of the tire, so to speak. Artistically
liberating in that it lets Anderson off the hook at an especially tense
juncture, this final freak occurrence doesn't go far enough in mirroring
the mysteries outlined in Magnolia's preface-it lacks a sense of
destiny, of psychic neatness.
At least the conclusion is beautiful to behold-cinematographer Robert
Elswit at peak performance. His camera is more patient, but no less
animate, here than elsewhere in the picture. Anderson has encouraged
Elswit and editor Dylan Tichenor to pace Magnolia, for the first
two-thirds, like a coke binge. This risky, channel-surfing approach
keeps us sharp and is utterly appropriate, considering the content-the
extended family members on display are children of the boob tube and
have built boxes around themselves. I gather that, because he has called
Magnolia his most personal effort in interviews, Anderson's scope of
experience does not range beyond dealings with entertainment industry
types, for Earl's turf is only two steps away from that of Boogie
Nights' porn czar Floyd Gondolli. Fortunately, the emotions on parade in
Magnolia are universal.
As you may have surmised, I'm a big fan of both Hard Eight and Boogie
Nights (which earned fourth place on my Top 10 of 1997); Anderson is one
of the only hip directors to emerge from the nineties with a discernible
style. Beyond the most obvious motifs-the whip pans (borrowed from
Scorsese but used to signature effect), the cutesy title cards, the
persistent music, and the penis fixation (there lurks a Dirk
Diggler-sized dragon in the briefs of Frank Mackey, too)-a hopefulness
pervades his work. The initially miserable Magnolia is Anderson's most
optimistic vision yet, made sonorous by the best ensemble of the year.
(It would be fruitless to pick standouts, for each actor leaves a
ghost.) The film's absolute message is sentimental and appealing: fate
doesn't have to win.
Magnolia is a deeply felt kitchen sink movie reminiscent, in a good way,
of Robert Altman's sprawling ensemble pieces (the cameo appearance of
Henry Gibson-as an old queen named Thurston Howell (!)-is an oblique
reference to Nashville). According to its defamers, Anderson has
committed the high crime of self-indulgence, a stigmatic observation
I've regrettably made in past reviews-it unfairly insinuates that
ambition is offensive. One should exit this film with, above all else,
respect for the modern Barnum's talent, chutzpah, and sincerity, and
wonder what he'll do for an encore.

Author
Mark O'Hara
Visit Online Film Critics Society at http//www.ofcs.org
A couple of times a year a film involves me so completely that I forget to 
notice things.  I stop looking for clever camera angles and listening for 
precise dialogue.  Eyes on the screen, defenses down, I hang on to question, 
predict and savor.
In "Magnolia," Paul Thomas Anderson has crafted just such a film, one that 
left me puzzled and pleased.  A social epic  -- Anderson could have borrowed 
Trollope's old title, "The Way We Live Now" - the film chronicles the lives 
of several people, tying together their existences in terrible and 
heart-rending ways.  Similar to any important film, there's a message here 
somewhere, and part of the pleasure is in figuring out how all of the pieces 
of social comment fit together.
The plot sprawls:  a result of the ensemble cast and subplots.  We follow 
the lives of several people through a remarkably short time - a very 
eventful day or so.  One character, Officer Jim Kurring (John C. Reilly), 
serves as a link between at least two of the subplots.  As such, he helps to 
unify the narrative, an important role in a big story.  Kurring answers a 
call to the apartment of an African-American woman who shouts and lies to 
him.  And this is only the first traumatic event of his shift.  Shortly 
later he comes up against a tiny and profound clown, an African-American boy 
who claims to know the perpetrator of the crime committed in the apartment;  
the boy tells it in a rap, though Kurring (and we) have a hard time 
understanding him.  There's a curious motif in Anderson's story:  it's 
sometimes hard to fathom a message even when we hear it plainly.  This 
situation is both frustrating and endearing, as we watch on to discover 
answers just as we feel mildly irked at coming up short of answers.  It's as 
if a couple of characters act as oracles in a life that is darn hard to 
predict.
Kurring later investigates noise in another apartment, and finds a young 
woman attempting to hide her cocaine sniffing.  This Claudia (Melora Walter) 
is so hopped up that a trace of comic relief seeps in as Officer Kurring 
speaks with her, wangling his way into her apartment for coffee and 
conversation, ostensibly to keep out of the rain.  Although Kurring seems 
oblivious to her state of high, he may also be exercising tact engendered by 
his compassion.  He truly seems interested in helping her.  Reilly is very 
strong in this role;  his gentleness is out of place because it is so 
striking.  The big man wears a moustache in this film, but his face is still 
a common and friendly one:  Reilly appears to be assuming in many of his 
performances a position not unlike the confidant in drama.  He's there to 
facilitate the workings of a very sophisticated plot.  Walter is also 
powerful in the part of  addict.  Hair ragged and eyes runny, she goes along 
with the cop's questions and hopes to be rid of him soon.  The rub she has 
to face is a challenging one - when he asks her on a date, hope begins to 
leak through her anguished expression.
But this is not nearly all.  Jason Robards plays Earl Partridge, a former 
television producer dying of cancer.  Confined to a hospital bed in the 
living room of his mansion, he interacts with a caregiver named Phil (Philip 
Seymour Hoffman).  Through his bouts of pain and oblivion, Partridge tells 
of his life and sources of grief;  his confession of abandoning his family 
and 14 year-old son (just as his wife was dying of cancer) does not, oddly 
enough, put us off more than a medium distance.  Robards is very convincing 
as this husk of a man, and Hoffman is even more compelling.  His is a good 
soul, accommodating the wishes of those around him in much the same way as 
Kurring the cop accommodates the common people around him, who dip and 
swerve into badness.
Julianne Moore plays Linda Partridge, the young wife of the dying man.  
What's original about her character is that her gold-digging instincts have 
left her, replaced by genuine love of Partridge; she now wishes to divest 
herself of any money she might inherit - which will be a huge sum.  Linda is 
the most foul-mouthed character in the piece, the words escaping her face 
with vicious carelessness.  Moore is the premiere actress at playing the 
big-hearted shrew.
Meanwhile, Partridge's long-estranged son, played by Tom Cruise, is now a 
cultural phenomenon.  He's the guru of a part of the men's movement gone 
haywire, the charismatic aggressor in a motivational business he calls 
"Seduce and Destroy."  Undereducated and misosgynistic, this man has taken 
the name of his dead mother's father, Frank Mackey - he so wishes to 
distance himself from father Earl.  Cruise has already been nominated for a 
Golden Globe as a best supporting actor - though it's hard to say which 
actor in the movie is not a supporting one.  Cruise's performance is nothing 
less than electrifying:  he's able to telegraph hatred and repressed 
loneliness with great clarity.  This may be his best acting yet.
Philip Baker Hall plays Jimmy Gator, the master of ceremonies of a 
long-running television quiz show that pits brilliant children against 
adults; the show is called "What Do Kids Know?"  One of Gator's problems is 
that he's suffering from both cancer and burnout, and he drinks even as he 
leaves his dressing room/office for the live show.  Hall is an accomplished 
actor, and "Magnolia" is a good vehicle for his talents:  he gets to play 
not only a fallen star, but a dysfunctional father (to Claudia) and husband 
(to Melinda Dillon's Rose Gator) as well.  Finally, this subplot includes a 
boy genius, Stanley, played by Jeremy Blackman.  This kids totes three or 
four backpacks brimming with books, without the help of his vain father, who 
alternately praises and curses Stanley from the green room.  It's 
fascinating to find out what Jeremy will do when one of the producers won't 
let him use the bathroom during the live format.
Ah, another of Anderson's themes - exploitation.  "Magnolia" gives us the 
biggest bunch of users in a long while.  One question the director/writer 
seems to be toying with is, Why are these characters behaving like this?  
Well, the very posing of this question tells us that Anderson is not out to 
take the easy way.  Instead, he probes into the backgrounds of many of his 
wandering souls, and we hear a sentiment William Faulkner would have liked: 
"We're through with the past, but the past isn't through with us."  
(Faulkner's version was, I think, "The past isn't dead; it isn't even past.) 
  Frank T. J. Mackey is so disturbed at least in part because of his 
abandonment; Stanley acts like he does because everyone seems to view him as 
a super-smart freak; William H. Macy's Donnie Smith - an adult version of 
Stanley - is looking for "a place to put his love."  All of these people 
have been neglected or abused in some way, their lives thrown into emotional 
dryness.
Perhaps the moments that will create the most buzz are the two forays into 
magical realism.  These are Anderson's real triumphs in the film - bits of 
bold risk-taking that give the piece vitality and lift it into the realm of 
fable.  It's easy to imagine, though, the conversation of viewers who will 
refuse to understand:  "What was that all about?  Did that really happen?  
That was stupid!"  These segments represent Paul Thomas Anderson's 
cleverness at using the medium for what it does best, offering a visual tone 
poem on life.  The cross-cutting among subplots is particularly well done.
Here's an objection, though.  It appears that Anderson uses the two unusual 
happenings as thematic alarms that highlight the links that tie these people 
together.  We can see them as students in the classroom of a creative ethics 
teacher, each one holding a length of yarn in a web that demonstrates what 
you do affects me, and vice versa.  This use is not problematic in itself; 
however, Anderson has also crafted a thin frame that tries to hold the whole 
picture.  The opening minutes of "Magnolia" focus on a series of bizarre 
coincidences - urban legends one might receive in junk e-mail, really.  The 
filmmaker does not need these, frankly, to get us to see the interconnected 
nature of human lives, nor to foreshadow the canted craziness of magic.
The editing, by Dylan Tichenor, does well in moving the narrative along, 
gathering its threads into a skein of recognition.  And the cinematography 
by Robert Elswit captures candid, down-to-earth angles.  Especially 
captivating are moments when we cannot hear the actors' dialogue because of 
the music - here we realize how life goes on, how every second of life is 
both precious and mundane.
"Magnolia" has so many small pleasures.  The opening credits are wonderful 
to watch on the broad screen:  we watched in a theater with stadium seating, 
the screen more than twice the width of regular ones.  The credits are also 
accompanied by lovely music, and a slightly psychedelic flavor from the late 
60's, the cast to the film slightly washed out as we see a shot of a 
magnolia flower, for instance.  I also liked Reilly's voice-over narration 
late in the film.  Mostly I found enough to intrigue me for over three hours 
- no small accomplishment for a director under 30, only a few films under 
his belt.
This is a definite R rating, not one I would drag a child to simply because 
I wanted to see it.  But its handling of complicated and crucial ideas is 
worthy of wide attention, and I expect it will be recognized at the 
ceremonies of several awards.  There have already been comparisons between 
"Magnolia" and Robert Altman's "Short Cuts" from the middle 90's.  In it 
Altman combines some of the tales of the master short storyist  Ray Carver, 
and spins some of his own.  Besides the sprawling plot and ensemble cast, it 
is difficult to compare the two films.  I'm sure Anderson considers Altman 
as one of his mentors, but "Magnolia" also has the feel of originality 
attained by a student of film who can teach us all a good deal.


Author
Mark R. Leeper
     In INTOLERANCE, D. W. Griffith told four different historical
stories at the same time, cutting from one to the other.  Each of the
stories builds to a fast-paced climax.  In MAGNOLIA, Paul Thomas
Anderson tells several stories each just tangentially connected to the
others.  Yet the stories and where they are going are all independent.
What is strange about these stories is that they are all synchronized.
Each story builds to a tense moment (or what appears to be intended to
be a tense moment) but then lets the tension dissolve.  While the
tension dissipates one character starts singing a song and in each
plotline the major characters sing along, even though they are not in
the same scene.  Then toward the end the stories each build to a tense
moment again.  It is almost as if the characters are somehow
psychically linked.  This creates some strange effects.  The stories
are about empty desperate people with dysfunctional relationships.  The
strands have varying degrees of bizarre content.  We have the story of
a dying man Earl Partridge (Jason Robards) wanting to get in touch with
his son and make amends.  Phil Parma (Philip Seymour Hoffman) is his
nurse who is frantic to help Partridge achieve his final goal.
Partridge's young wife Linda (Julianne Moore) is getting more and more
anxious as Partridge dies, but for an unsuspected reason.  Frank Mackey
(Tom Cruise) runs the kinds of self-help seminar that businesses like
so much, but he aims his at teaching disaffected men how to be real
shit-heels in dealing with women in an angry backlash to women's lib.
Officer Jim Kurring (John C. Reilly) is a patrolman who has a need to
feel he is making the world a better place.  Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker
Hall) hosts a popular children's TV quiz show that really exploits and
destroys children as we see from the stories of current quiz kid
Stanley Spector (Jeremy Blackman) and former quiz kid Donnie Smith
(William H. Macy).  The film juggles all these stories for over three
hours, but even after all this time not one story is resolved
satisfactorily.  Each story moves toward a single bizarre common
climax, but it is not one that seems to do much but derail each story.
The common climax itself is ambiguous in many ways and it fails to
really tie up any of the stories.  The film seems to be built around
strange events and weird history, but it really has little to do with
the content of the stories, though they all are connected in part by
one weird event.
     MAGNOLIA will probably bring some much deserved attention to Paul
Thomas Anderson, though in my opinion his two previous films, HARD
EIGHT and BOOGIE NIGHTS were better told stories.  It is interesting
that one starts to look forward to actors from Anderson's company.
John C. Reilly seems to be a standard fixture.  Particularly notable is
Philip Baker Hall who gave a mesmerizing performance from the first
scene of HARD EIGHT.  Here he several of the characters are
mesmerizing, but that characteristic is not really used.
     As studies of characters these stories are each worth following.
As well-rounded stories with a beginning, middle and end, they leave
something to be desired.  But the film is willing to do the unexpected
and that helps make the film worth sitting through.  I rate it a 7 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     During the strange climactic event of the film we get multiple
messages from the filmmaker that the event we are seeing really does
happen.  And in actual fact, it does.  Since Biblical times rains of
frogs have been interpreted as signs of displeasure of the gods.  It
is, however, a perfectly natural, if somewhat unnerving, phenomenon.
The cause is associated with whirlwinds.  We know that tornadoes over
land can rip up land and even objects of some size from the ground and
hurl them into the air, holding them aloft.  The reader may remember
the unfortunate cow in TWISTER.  Smaller objects can be hurled high
into the atmosphere and then be kept aloft by the updrafts for
surprisingly long periods of time much as hail and chunks of ice are.
When the whirlwind is over water, animals near the surface, frequently
fish and frogs, may suffer the same fate.  Essentially they are
vacuumed up by the whirlwind, held aloft by updrafts, and finally
dropped elsewhere.
     So while the rain is possible, some doubts do creep in.  The rain
of frogs depicted in this film may be of greater scale than I had
pictured for a rain of frogs.  It seems unlikely the frogs would still
be alive when dropped.  It is not clear that geographic conditions are
right for Los Angeles to have this sort of phenomenon.  (Frankly I have
no idea on these points.)  Otherwise the event was quite believable.
What we see in this film is much more credible than the phenomena we
saw in VOLCANO.
     In the film it is left ambiguous if the rain is a sign from God
since there are many references to Exodus 8:2. "And the frogs shall
come up both on thee and upon thy people, and upon all thy servants."
However a rain of frogs, though it feels Biblical, is most definitely
NOT a Biblical portent.  Note that the previous verse says "And the
river shall bring forth frogs abundantly which shall go up...," so the
Bible is referring not to a rain but to an infestation from the river.
The only other reference to frogs in the Bible is as a symbol for
uncleanness in Revelation 16:13.

Author
Sean P. Molloy
Starring John C. Reilly, Julianne Moore, Tom Cruise, Jason Robards
Directed by P.T. Anderson
New Line Cinema, Rated R, 1999
Running Time: 2 Hours 59 Minutes
[LIGHT SPOILERS - Nothing here you shouldn't read]
When I become a significant enough celebrity to be interviewed (not
too long now...), inevitably I will be asked how I wound up where I
am. And when that happens, I'll sit back in my flower-encircled
chair... contemplate the ceiling for a moment... and say, "Oh, let's
seeeee..." sigh... "Well, gee, I'd say it's gotta be my strong family
ties, all the common goals and interests I share with my friends... my
unflinching determination... my charismatic smile and humble
modesty... and a sense that, darn it, I know who I am and where I
belong..."
Or, maybe I'll say, "Oh, let's seeeee... it's gotta be a bus ride
twenty-five years ago in Washington DC, a passing compliment to a
stranger about a nice hat, the mechanics of alphabetical order, and a
3 a.m. emergency room visit a couple Januarys back."
With his stunning third film, writer/director P.T. Anderson has
composed a beautiful symphony of human interaction. This is a rich and
insightful study of the invisible forces that bind us together even as
they seemingly alienate us.  The story darts between the lives of
nearly a dozen lonely people that are all tangentially
connected. Weather patterns are used as both a recurring metaphor for
the fragile, forceful, seemingly chaotic connections between human
lives, as well as a bit of foreshadowing for a scene that I will
continue to marvel at until the day they stop making these moving
picture shows.
Some may ask: "Do we really need to sit through a three and a half
hour movie to find out that we don't have complete control of our
lives? I could have told you that when I was eight." My answer is,
well, no, I suppose you don't have to - but Magnolia never pretends
it's letting us in on something we don't already know.
P. T. Anderson proves here what he hinted at with Boogie Nights - he
is a gifted and talented filmmaker. I once read a book which argued
that entering the mind of another person would be like landing on an
alien shore - strangely familiar, mostly incomprehensible. Anderson
knows this too, it seems, as every character in Magnolia has a unique
history, personality, and drive.
The remarkable cast plays no small part in bringing these people to
vibrant life. There isn't a single off performance here, although in
this crew of standouts, Tom Cruise somehow manages to shine as the
repulsively charismatic Frank T.J. Mackey, a wreck of a human being if
ever there was one. His role requires dynamic personality changes, and
Cruise handles each one precisely right, delivering a complete and
complex character sketch. Phillip Seymour Hoffman, whose recent work
in Boogie Nights and Happiness (among a handful of others) have shown
us he is well on his way to becoming one of the all-time great
character actors, plays a nurse who lives vicariously through those he
takes care of. William H. Macy can do no wrong in my book, and his
role here as a former child game show star Donnie Smith is one of his
finest, as a man with a ludicrously tragic obsession that serves as a
poor placeholder for absent love.  A young kid named Stanley Spector
(Jeremy Blackman) is now on the same game show that made former quiz
kid Donnie Smith what he is today. As we watch the young Stanley, we
feel as if we are witnessing a re-creation; then we wonder what would
have become of ol' Donnie if the length of a commercial break and the
size of a child's bladder had somehow managed to intervene in his life
thirty years ago. John Rielly's good-hearted police officer and Melora
Walters' nervous drug addict have an eerie chemistry together - as I
watched I couldn't decide whether they're the perfect match for one
another or exactly the opposite.
Magnolia manages to sustain as relentless and dizzying a pace as this
sort of drama can for the first two hours. I was both completely
engaged and exhausted by the time some welcome calm finally crept in
at the beginning of the third hour... in this case, the calm before
the storm. A remarkable scene, in which the majority of the characters
come to the same realization at the same time - is made more powerful
by one of the best uses of a soundtrack song (Aimee Mann penned the
majority of the songs) in my film-going memory. Moments of eerie
coincidence like this recur throughout and serve to strengthen the
idea that you can never be alone in a crowd.
This is the kind of movie that reveals itself slowly; it was four days
before I finally sorted everything out. Some things still leave me
puzzled, including the title. I made a wild guess that Magnolias
blossom slowly in the morning, but my knowledge of flower behavior is
sorely lacking these days... or perhaps, as the poster would seem to
indicate, each petal on a flower is independent, yet connected to the
whole... or, perhaps still, it's just a cool thing to name your
movie-that-dodges-conventional-naming. I sure as hell wouldn't know
what to call it. There's also a strange and indecipherable (well, to
me, anyway) rap delivered to Reilly's cop character by a potential
prophet - either it contained every answer I was looking for in one
neat little rhyme and I missed it, or it was just superfluous. I'd
have to see it again to figure that one out.
There is nothing timid about Magnolia. It is daring and bold as any
other film in this year of wonderful originality. (You've probably
heard about the brashness of the ending, but I dare not discuss it
here for fear of being drawn and quartered... though oh how it pains
me to hold my tongue...) Magnolia is melodramatic and shameless. It's
one of the best movies I've seen this year.
_____________
Media Junkies - Movie reviews, music, books, games, and more.
http://www.mediajunkies.com
Contact: media@mediajunkies.com

Author
Alex Ioshpe
MPAA: Rated R for strong language, drug use, sexuality and some violence.
Runtime: USA:188 / UK:188 / Argentina:188 / Finland:188 / France:184 /
Japan:187
Language: English
Color: Black and White / Color (DeLuxe)
Sound Mix: Dolby / SDDS
Certification: USA:R / UK:18 / Germany:12 / Hong Kong:IIB / Mexico:B /
Netherlands:16 / Singapore:PG / Norway:11 /Sweden:11
"..We may be finished with the past, but the past is not finished with us.."
- MAGNOLIA
Paul T. Anderson's 'Magnolia' is truly an exotic flower, dazzling with its
freshness and beauty. And the closer you look, the more you see of its
splendor. Other critics have already written many reviews depicting its
length and dullness. There are many stories. Some even fall asleep in the
theatre. So if you were discouraged by such remarks, think again! Because
this picture is one of the most interesting and original films of the year.
To sum up 'Magnolia' is impossible and unnecessary, since I trust you'll see
this film anyway, but I'll try. On one random day in the San Fernando
Valley, a dying father (Jason Robards), a young wife (Julianne Moore), a
male caretaker (Philip Seymour Hoffman), a famous lost son (Tom Cruise), a
police officer in love (John C. Reilly), a boy genius (Jeremy Blackman), an
ex-boy genius (William H. Macy), a wealthy game show host (Philip Baker
Hall) and an estranged daughter (Melora Walters ) will each become part of a
dazzling multiplicity of plots, but one story. Through a collusion of
coincidence, chance, human action, shared media, past history and divine
intervention they will weave and warp through each other's lives on a day
that builds to an unforgettable climax. Some will seek forgiveness, others
escape. Some will mend frayed bonds, others will be exposed. Magnolia is a
mosaic of American life woven through a series of comic and poignant
vignettes. It is a portrait of a lonely city sometimes called up short on
love. It is a personal exploration of the hidden elements of crisis. It is a
story about putting things right again.
P.T. Anderson had his debut with "Boogey Nights" in 1997 -- a strong and
shocking peek into the porn industry. As many other original films, it was
underrated and unfairly treated, robbing Anderson for a deserved Oscar
nomination. "Magnolia" is his second venture into the world of filmmaking.
Anderson is an "actors' director". His cast consists of many great stars and
some not so great ones, but everyone gives an award worthy performance.
That includes Julianne Moore as the hysterical young beauty, Jason Robards
as the alienated and forgotten father. And then you have Tom Cruise , that
gives a mesmerizing and completely unexpected performance that is probably
the best I've seen this year. He plays Frank Mackey, a sex-guru that has
gained enormous popularity in the "underground". He is the leader of
confused men that are scared, hurt or dumped by women. His only problem,
underneath the sparkling facade, is dealing with his past. This is Tom as
you've never seen him - with a pony tail, leather clothes and an energy that
would make Muhamed Ali look like a slow turtle in comparison, Cruise
magnetizes the audience with his best performance in years. The reason that
the acting is at such high level has a lot to do with Anderson's fabulous
script. He creates characters that are so colorful and real, that they
almost jump out of the screen. There is a cop - an idealist that lives to
help people out of trouble. He dreams of a perfect world. Despite of his
goodness and genuine kindness, he is unappreciated and unlucky.
Coincidentally (?) he meets a girl and falls in love, but is too clumsy and
shy to tell her how he feels. There is a wiz-kid that can answer any
question, besides how to win his father's love. There is a young wife that
married her husband for money and only realizes that she really loves him
when he is dying. You really want these guys to be well, so that they can
finally find happiness.
'Magnolia' has resemblance to 'Eyes Wide Shut', in its story and character
development and surrealistic components. The film starts fast, almost
hysterically, with cameras moving quickly back and forth, and events
overlapping. After a while Anderson slows down and we can dive into these
people, although we only get to see one day of their lives. Each person and
event is like one unique beautiful leaf, each sprung out of one common
source, that somehow binds and connects them. It is simply a different
expression. You can't just observe it from a distance. You have to let
yourself go, and when Anderson has you, he doesn't let go. And then you'll
cry and laugh and walk out of the theatre enlightened.
"Magnolia" is a day in our lives. A fragment. It is a story about love,
regret and forgiveness. It is about coincidences and how they affect our
lives. It questions whether things "just happen" or whether everything is a
part of a big and complex plan. Is the universe laughing with us or at us?
Chance or Fate? Coincidence or Destiny? Yes, strange things do happen.

Author
James Sanford
         "We may be through with the past, but the past ain't through
with us." That line turns up again and again in "Magnolia," director
Paul Thomas Anderson's dizzying swing through the lives of an assortment
of L.A. residents, all of whom are troubled, mostly by unresolved
relationships or feelings they've tried to avoid. Rife with unexpected
outbursts, moments of catharsis and deeply funny observations about love
and sex, this is a film that runs you through the emotional wringer,
then shifts into reverse and pulls you back through again.
 Running a generous three hours-plus, "Magnolia" allows Anderson
to give his cast room to explore all the corners of their characters.
Almost every one of the central figures gets a soul-revealing monologue,
making this a prime example of an actor's movie, and, for that matter, a
writer's movie as well.
 It is not, however, a picture the average moviegoer is likely
to eat up. "Magnolia" shares with Anderson's previous film "Boogie
Nights" a fascination with detail and nuance, with taking scenes to
their limits and then daring to stretch them a little further to find
some extra scrap of emotion or a surprising twist. In one of the most
powerful sequences in "Boogie Nights," Heather Graham and Burt Reynolds,
as porno star Rollergirl and her director respectively, troll Los
Angeles in a limo looking for a guy who'll agree to be videotaped while
having sex with Rollergirl. The man they choose turns out to be a former
classmate of Rollergirl, which shakes her up, although she tries to
maintain a cool facade since she doesn't want the camera to see her get
flustered. Even after the episode's abrupt ending, Anderson lingered on
Graham's face, letting her eyes and lips spell out the battle going on
inside her mind between her passionless professionalism and the life she
left behind years ago.
 There are many moments like this in "Magnolia," particularly
for "Boogie" veterans William H. Macy and Julianne Moore and for a
shockingly cast-against-type Tom Cruise. It's Cruise's performance
that's likely to get the most attention, since he's by far the
raunchiest and most unsettling presence in the film, a self-adoring
macho guru named Frank Mackey who pitches his anti-feminist "Seduce and
Destroy" workshops in a series of TV infomercials. Promising his
followers he can teach how to "make that lady 'friend' your sex-starved
slave," Frank is like a foul-mouthed high school jock blown up to
gargantuan proportions.
 Macy's character is Donnie Smith, a former child prodigy who
never recovered from his early dose of celebrity and today works as a
salesman in an appliance store when he's not humiliating himself at the
neighborhood tavern, telling disinterested barflies "I used to be smart,
but now I'm just stupid." A blow-up of the $100,000 check he won on the
"What Do Kids Know?" game show hangs on his living room wall, a constant
reminder of how far he's fallen. He's also miserably lonely, confiding
to strangers "I really do have love to give, I just don't know where to
put it."
 Moore's Linda Partridge, on the other hand, went out of her way
to sidestep love by marrying solely for money. Now, as her husband Earl
(Jason Robards) slowly dies at home, Linda is completely consumed with
self-hatred and erupts at everyone she comes into contact with, from the
family lawyer to an obnoxious pharmacist who makes cracks about her
Prozac prescription.
 No one would want to identify with any of these people, and the
actors don't try to make them likable. Quite the contrary: Moore, Macy
and Cruise seem determined to show us just how unattractive and pathetic
Frank, Linda and Donnie really are by showing all their defense
mechanisms, their explosions of anger and their inability to understand
themselves.
 "Magnolia" also zooms in on some folks who are suffering in
silence, such as Officer Jim (John C. Reilly), a divorced cop and devout
Catholic who's so eager for companionship he tries to pick up Claudia
(Melora Walters), an obvious cokehead he investigates for disturbing the
peace. The timid, bookwormish Stanley (Jeremy Blackman) is the current
champion on "What Do Kids Know?" and, to judge from appearances, a
likely candidate to follow in Donnie's footsteps. Phil Parma (Philip
Seymour Hoffman), Earl's nurse, channels his energy into a frantic
last-minute search for Earl's long-estranged son and quietly endures
disapproving Linda's abuse.
 The thoughts these people can't bring themselves to speak come
through in the searing songs of Aimee Mann, which string together the
movie's various parallel plots. "Come on and save me," Mann pleads in
her delicate, bruised voice, "from the ranks of the freaks who suspect
they could never love anyone." This is not a film in which the
soundtrack was slapped on at the last minute. In one of "Magnolia"'s
most stirring scenes, each of the major characters is glimpsed singing
along to Mann's ballad "Wise Up" shortly before Anderson unleashes a
climax so startling and utterly bizarre it should cement his reputation
as one of the most audacious filmmakers around. James Sanford

Author
Jerry Saravia
I both loved and hated "Magnolia." Let me explain further. I've seen it twice,
and I am convinced that Paul Thomas Anderson's multilayered, mosaic character
study is the best American film of 1999. It is also a frustrating experience of
a movie because it is so filled with emotional pain and regret that it causes
one to avert their eyes from the screen in the hopes that it will all be over.
Of course, this is what life often feels like, full of regrets and pain since
we are all human and flawed. And that is what makes "Magnolia" such a cinematic
marvel to witness. 
"Magnolia" is set in L.A. on one rainy 24 hour day. It is raining so much that
all the characters keep referring to how it is "raining like cats and dogs." We
are shown the lives of several different characters who may live on the same
street named Magnolia. There is the lonesome, clumsy cop (John C. Reilly) who
is ready for any relationship that comes his way; the elderly Earl Partridge
(Jason Robards), a wealthy man who is near death; the sympathetic nurse (Philip
Seymour Hoffman) who takes care of Earl; Earl's gold-digging wife with a
conscience (Julianne Moore); the strutting, sexed-up guru Frank T.J. Mackey
(Tom Cruise), Earl's estranged son; the tired quiz show host dying of cancer
(Philip Baker Hall); the coked-up quiz show host's daughter who loves Aimee
Mann songs (Melora Walters); the genius whiz kid (Jeremy Blackman), a
participant on the aforementioned quiz show; and finally, the lonely, pathetic
former child genius Donnie Smith (William H. Macy) who wants love and has love
to give. 
"Magnolia" begins with an ingenious prologue about chances and coincidences in
life, told through some famous urban legends. One includes an attempted suicide
that becomes a homicide, a store clerk killed by three thieves who bear his
name, and the connection between a blackjack dealer and a pilot. The point of
these vignettes is to show how some people can come together by sheer
coincidence without knowing why or how. And, in essence, that is what
"Magnolia" is about. 
Somehow, these people find a way of connecting to each other in ways not
imaginable to them, or at least not immediately apparent to them. The most
powerful scenes involve the heartless, cynical Frank who is the guru of
something called "Search and Destroy," demonstrating to men the various methods
on how to get laid (those scenes are as electrifying as anything Cruise has
ever done before). When Frank realizes that his father is dying, he badgers the
man verbally and then lets out an emotional cannon that is as moving as Marlon
Brando's similar moment of realization in "Last Tango in Paris." 
Then there is the emotionally high-strung wife of Earl (Moore) who regrets
cheating on her husband and suddenly realizes that she loves him. A crucial
scene is when she stops at a pharmacy to get medicine for her husband. She is
questioned about her prescriptions, and Moore begins to curse the clerk,
shaming him for calling her a lady. It is so effectively unwatchable that it
will make you cringe. Along with "Cookie's Fortune," "The End of the Affair,"
and "An Ideal Husband," 1999 will be remembered as the year of Julianne Moore,
a gifted actress of extraordinary range. 
There are many performances worth mentioning but I will at least mention one of
our most unsung actors in America, John C. Reilly (who appeared in P.T.
Anderson's "Boogie Nights" and "Hard Eight"). He plays Officer Jim Kurring, who
prays quite often and is seeking a mate. He finds one in the quiz show host's
daughter (Walters) who plays her stereo far too loud. He is immediately smitten
and asks her out on a date, oblivious to her drug abuse and her high-pitched
personality. She does not realize what a klutz he is since he loses his gun and
nightstick quite often.
"Magnolia" is full of so many great scenes and acute moments of observation
that some of it will remind you of Robert Altman's classic "Short Cuts." The
similarity ends as far as the mosaic of characters (there were far more in
Altman's film) because writer-director Paul Thomas Anderson has a musical
structure in mind that is as unusual and breathless as anything I have ever
seen before. Never mind the various songs by Aimee Mann (written specifically
for the film), Mr. Anderson has also mentioned that he based the narrative
structure on the Beatles song, "A Day in the Life." There is even a moment
where each of the characters sings the lyrics to the Aimee Mann song "Wise Up."
"Magnolia" is surely the most musical of all films in a long time. 
It would not be fair to reveal more of the surprises in "Magnolia," since one
cannot predict what will happen from one scene to the next. The film builds
with so much power and tension that it leads to a climactic moment that you
will either love or hate (let's say that the "Exodus 8:2" signs are there for a
reason). Some will argue that this film is too strange, bizarre and exaggerated
to understand or comprehend. Those are the naysayers talking who do not wish
for cinema to take such leaps and bounds from the ordinary. "Magnolia" is one
of the most profoundly moving films of the 1990's with an ensemble cast that is
as uniformly brilliant as you can imagine. All great films are tough to forget
- this one will grow on you and get underneath your skin. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Author
Susan Granger
http://www.speakers-podium.com/susangranger.
 As a follow-up to the porn movie scene of Boogie Nights,
writer/director Paul Thomas Anderson examines the emotional effects of
physical and spiritual cancer in this manic, rambling tale of dying
fathers and their pathetic children in the rootless '90s. In what is
basically an ensemble movie, set in a single, very long day in
California's San Fernando Valley and not unlike Robert Altman's Short
Cuts, Jason Robards provides the connective tissue as an irascible
television producer with terminal cancer and a grieving,
guilt-stricken trophy wife (Julianne Moore). He begs his male nurse
(Philip Seymour Hoffman) to find his long-lost son so he can make
amends. Played with fervor by Tom Cruise, the son's now a charismatic
sex evangelist, motivational guru and host of a TV info-mercial,
teaching "Seduce and Destroy." Strutting and swaggering, he goads his
male audience into sexual exploits. In a somewhat parallel story,
Philip Baker Hall, the guilty host of a popular TV show, called "What
Do Kids Know?" and married to Melinda Dillon, is also ailing, as his
estranged, coke-snorting daughter (Melora Walters) becomes involved
with a good-natured cop (John C. Reilly). One of the current Quiz
contestants (Jeremy Blackman) is desperate for attention, while a
former Quiz Kid (William H. Macy) watches his life disintegrate in a
bar. Three hours, ten minutes is a long time to keep an audience
involved in 10 characters, connected by chance and coincidence, even
with Robert Elswit's inventive cinematography and Aimee Mann's "Wise
Up" song interwoven into the fabric of the convoluted, overly talky
narrative. On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, Magnolia is a
cacophonous, kinetic, audacious 7 with a bizarre, illogical, climactic
conclusion related to the Bible, Exodus 8:2.

Author
James Brundage
Written and Directed by Paul Thomas Anderson
Starring Jason Robards, Julianne Moore, Tom Cruise,
Phillip Seymour Hoffman, John C. Reilly, Melora
Walters, Jeremy Blackman, Michael Bowen, William H.
Macy, Phillip Baker Hall, and Melinda Dillon
        In the spring of 1999, a whale beached itself on the
shores of sunny California.  The whale was dead as a
doornail... there was nothing anyone could do about
that.  The question became this: what do we do with
its body.  The State Troopers were in charge of this,
and they decided that the best thing to do would be to
blow it up.  The event was naturally something that
the media decides to drop by for.  In fact, not only
are the TV crews there, but everyone is there.  So the
State Troopers, they rig this big tub of blubber with
several tons of TNT, and wire it to blow.
        Huge pieces of whale fat are flying through the air. 
It's pandemonium.  People are running for their lives.
 The fat is so big, that one piece crushes a nearby
Volkswagen.
        Although no whales fly through the air, another
animal (in both the funniest and most bizarre sequence
I have seen all year) does.  You see, in Magnolia,
writer-director Paul Thomas Anderson would like us to
believe that this kind of thing happens all of the
time.
        The film Magnolia can be described as a series of
loosely interlocked narratives that demonstrate how
utterly surreal life is.  In Magnolia, we have 12 main
characters and 9 interlocking stories.  These stories
all play themselves out over a 24-hour period in the
San Fernando Valley.
        For those of you who immediately think Short Cuts
when I mention this, please don't.  There are two
major differences.  The first is that Short Cuts took
place over a weekend.  The second is that Short Cuts
was boring and drawn out.  Magnolia is as quick and
funny and touching as the stories it tells.
        Anderson handles his film with a steady hand that
this promises to be his best film ever despite its
three hour running time.  It also promises to be his
most bizarre and this is talking about the guy who
directed Hard Eight and Boogie Nights.
        Magnolia features several completely odd sequences an
moments, the first of which is a football-play-like
description of a suicide-turned-homicide (a man jumps
off a roof, only to be shot in the chest on the way
down.).  The second bizarre sequence is when every
different character of the film sings along to the
same song, despite the fact that the song is not
playing on any radio and the characters are all in
different locations.  The third is the crowning
achievement of the film, a series of moments that I
cannot adequately describe nor convey the greatness
of.  To say one thing about the film though, it is the
oddest thing I have seen all year and it kept me up
until 3:00 AM thinking about it.
        The largest question with the ensemble cast of
Magnolia is this: to whom will the academy awards go
to.  Nearly every actor and actress in the film
deserves an award for his or her work.  Basing my
predictions on the love of the Academy for
over-the-top performance, I predict a nomination for
Tom Cruise, who plays a man who makes his money off of
a program called "Seduce and Destroy."  To imagine the
character, picture Fight Club's Tyler Durden when he's
really horny.  Also, begging for an award is Julianne
Moore, who has already garnered two Golden-Globe
nominations for her works in The End of the Affair and
An Ideal Husband.  Moore plays a woman who has fallen
in love with the rich millionaire who she married for
money right while the man is on his deathbed.
        The only thing that Magnolia has to its discredit are
the speeches that Anderson placed in the film.  Every
time that one character opens his mouth, be ready for
a five-minute talk, because sooner or later, that's
what you'll get.
        As always, my top five fills up fast come December,
and this film takes Eyes Wide Shut's place as the
second-best film of the year.  It trails right after
American Beauty, by the length of a pin.
Join epinions, view the reviews, add your trust.

Author
Dennis Schwartz

MAGNOLIA (director/writer: Paul Thomas Anderson; cinematographer: Robert
Elswit; cast: Jeremy Blackman (Stanley Spector), Tom Cruise (Frank T. J.
Mackey), Melinda Dillon (Rose Gator), April Grace (Gwenovier, reporter),
Luis Guzman (Luis), Philip Baker Hall (Jimmy Gator), Philip Seymour
Hoffman (Phil Parma), Ricky Jay (Burt Ramsey), Orlando Jones (Worm),
William H. Macy (Donnie Smith, quiz kid), Alfred Molina (Solomon
Solomon), Julianne Moore (Linda Partridge), John C. Reilly (Jim
Kurring), Jason Robards (Earl Partridge), Melora Walters (Claudia Wilson
Gator), Michael Bowen (Stanley's father), 1999)
This is a wonderfully chaotic work, meriting high praise for what it
tried to do and not condemnation for what it failed to do. There's such
a thing as something being spoiled because it has too many good things
going for it. That is the case with this ensemble dramatic piece, whose
most telling fault is that it eventually resembles an overblown soap
opera, going on for far too long. Its three hours length and many
subplots will attest to that, even though it is artfully woven together,
but could in all honesty, have enough material for five other movies
within it. Therefore it is not surprising that the ingenuously talented
director, the 29-year-old Paul Thomas Anderson (Boogie Nights/Hard
Eight), had to finally tie-up all the loose ends of the story into a
nice knot, which resulted in an ending that won't please too many
because it might seem absurd. But I found myself accepting of its
biblical ending and was impressed by the overall stupendous effort of
this exuberant film, that is pumped with self-confidence and a virtuoso
style. A work that mirrors greatness even if it doesn't quite keep that
greatness in proper focus.
The film does go on for too long, with the only thing that could save it
from never ending is a biblical miracle, but it settles instead for a
plague right out of Exodus in the Bible to make its farewell. That
improbable ending was set up and apologized for in its prologue by the
offscreen narrator, who explained three different bizarre chance
happenings as unlikely but possible, giving cause for the improbable
ending the film comes up with, and after all, how absurd could that
ending be, if the Bible used the same material! In one of those prologue
pieces, a London druggist, in 1911, named Greenberryhill, gets killed by
three drifters named, Green, Berry, and Hill.
The reward the viewer gets for sitting through the long and highly
structured but at times confusing film, that tries to picture life as
being a matter of coincidences, is how brilliant the individual skits
were and how fine the acting was. The cast, of Anderson regulars Philip
Baker Hall, Philip Seymour Hoffman, William H. Macy, Julianne Moore, and
John C. Reilly, are larger than life figures. To see Jason Robards as a
dying old crotchety TV mogul, with a tube up his nose, made for some
effective dramatics. Even Tom Cruise, as his estranged son, playing an
obnoxious hustling infomercials maker for the product he is selling to
men, so that they can conquer women, was done with a blend of humor and
pathos, making his role less obnoxious than it could have been. In a
role that reminded me, of Jean-Pierre Leaud' outlandish performance in
"Irma Vep." Here, Cruise goes for the jugular, as a boorish male
predator, someone who is just plain unlikable and prone to going off on
rants. What Cruise does, is parody himself and other box-office stars
with big egos. Cruise is becoming a noticeably more polished actor ever
since his Kubrick stint in "Eyes Wide Shut," and deserves much praise
for this role.
This is a Los Angeles based film about the casualities of modernism,
each one lost in their own shame and failure to be loved. Each life is
depicted as being that of a victim, who has been affected by the mass
culture of the TV and popular musical worlds, and crippled
psychologically by such after-effects. They are all-tied together too
neatly and the outcome of their sufferings is too predictable for my
taste. But that can't begin to explain how penetrating a human drama
this is and how acutely aware the young director is of the people's
misery and heartaches he highlights. He is mostly guilty of being
excessive, wanting to put too much of a good thing on the plate, in this
Robert Altman's Short Cuts-Nashville like production. But Anderson
offers more meat in his character's parts than did Altman and more
finesse in telling his story, allowing his actors to expand their roles
more.
The film involves the lives of these nine characters during one rainy
day in Southern California. They are each connected for one of the
following reasons: because something happened in their past that stunted
their growth, by their family relationships, and by mere coincidence.
And, even though all their lives don't intersect, they are all fighting
the same battle to have a clean slate, whether they realize it or not.
There is a sensitive but unappreciated cop, who wants to be of help to
others, James (John C. Reilly), his coke-using junkie date, resentful of
her abusive father, (Melora Walters), her kid game-show host, bastard of
a father (Philip Baker Hall), who has learned that he has an incurable
cancer and wants to make amends for his past sins, and his current whiz
kid star, the unhappy genius, Stanley (Jeremy Blackman), who is bullied
by his father, and there is the former whiz kid, now a pathetic grown
man with problems over his homosexual love life and his failure to be
financially successful, Donnie Smith (William H. Macy ). There's also
the game show's wealthy producer, who lies in pain as he is dying,
requesting only to speak to his son who won't talk to him now, Earl
Partridge (Jason Robards), and the gorgeous younger, unfaithful wife he
married when he left his cancer striken first-wife, the now hysterical
and remorseful Linda (Julianne Moore), and Earl's estranged son, who
when he was 14-years-old nursed his abandoned mother suffering from
cancer until she died, the TV pitchman, full of denial and hatred about
his past, Frank T. J. Mackey (Tom Cruise), and finally, the home care
nurse, Phil Parma (Philip Seymour Hoffman), who is sexually frustrated,
given to read Hustler magazine, but who is dedicated to looking out for
Mr. Partridge as best as he can.
The performances by all were superb, but Reilly's and Hoffman's were
better than superb, in a film that didn't have a featured player, but
allowed each performer to take his or her time telling their story, as
Anderson was able to create a somewhat seamless work out of this
separate skits, making use of different camera angles, using TV
intercutting methods, fast-cut editing, and utilizing a provocative
visual style. He also made the story seem fresh and moving in many
different directions to catch all the personalities involved in the
story. He also made use of a song, through the performance of Aimee
Mann, who somewhere more than half-way through the film, sings the theme
song of the film, and it is heard first by one character, then another,
until all the film's troubled souls are brought together by a single
refrain. "It's not ... going to stop," as each one sings, as if
signaling the approach of some impending doom.
Whatever fault one might find with the film, that fault is countered by
how interesting and refreshing the film felt, and with the director's
flair for taking risks. The unbelievable tale puts one into the mood of
the magic happening onscreen, and the magic was not necessarily in what
was extraordinary and not in the cleverly plotted coincidences, but in
the telling tragedies of the lost souls and their injured psyches,
casualities that are inevitable in America's modern world of
consumerism. The cry for love can be heard on the lips of the two
deathlike, philandering fathers, and on all the other lost souls, each
searching for a place to fit in and for a way to love someone and be
loved in return.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Jamey Hughton
Starring-Jason Robards, Julianne Moore, Tom Cruise, Philip Baker Hall,
John C. Reilly, Philip Seymour Hoffman, William H. Macy and Melora
Walters
Director-Paul Thomas Anderson
Canadian Rating-14A
Released by New Line Cinema - 01/00
This is explained in the opening prologue of Paul Thomas Anderson's
`Magnolia'. Our narrator (Ricky Jay) guides us through several unlikely
scenarios of chance and coincidence that display, with great humor, how
past relevance can intrude on the present. For instance: a man plummets
off the side of a building in a suicide attempt, but is inflicted with a
shotgun blast on his way to landing in netting that would have surely
saved his life. The shotgun was fired by his mother from their apartment
several floors below. With shotgun cocked, she was violently threatening
her husband when the weapon accidentally fired and struck their son on
his descent to the netting. But she insists that, to her knowledge, the
gun was never loaded. Coincidentally, it was he - the suicide `victim' -
had loaded the weapon a few weeks prior, hoping that it would end the
feuding his parents had continued for years. `These strange things
happen all the time,' the narrator concludes. P.T. Anderson has
collected a photo album of lonely, troubled characters in an
intersecting plot line that he uses to prove this thesis.
`Magnolia', a sprawling masterpiece of operatic grandeur, is an
ambitious film in which the director's inventive jest never seems to
stop flowing. Anderson leads us through several intertwining stories in
Los Angeles, and each is fascinating for separate reasons. There is the
story of cancer-stricken television producer Earl Partridge (Jason
Robards), who lies on his deathbed, attended to by his unstable young
wife (Julianne Moore) and a caring nurse (Philip Seymour Hoffman). Earl
desperately wants to get in touch with his distant son, who, we soon
realize, is self-help sex guru Frank TJ Mackey (Tom Cruise). Frank has
made himself an icon among males everywhere with his `Search and
Destroy' program and his energized public seminars, in which he
raucously lectures the audience on how to best invade female territory.
There's the story of game show legend Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall),
who has hosted the beloved quiz show `What Do Kids Know?' for 30-odd
years. Jimmy has also received the news that he is dying from cancer,
and, in light of the fact his strength is deteriorating faster than
anticipated, he tries to reunite with his daughter Claudia (Melora
Walters). Meanwhile, current `What Do Kids Know?' contestant Stanley
Spector (Jeremy Blackman) begins to notice his rigid father (Michael
Bowen) sees him as merely a walking encyclopedia for cash income. And
former child genius Donnie Smith (William H. Macy) ponders the
misfortune of his job at an electronics store, and looks back at his
brief and turbulent 15-minutes of fame.
Finally, there is the story of Jim Kurring (John C. Reilly), a
mild-mannered police officer looking for love at age 32. In more ways
than one, Anderson uses the Kurring character as the backbone of the
story. He is kind and thoughtful where other characters are rough and
violent, adding some emotional stability to the mix. As an ensemble
piece, `Magnolia' is superbly crafted. The dignified and accomplished
cast of actors balance their screen time miraculously, and each is given
the spotlight at some pivotal time to properly voice their character's
emotional dilemma. Everyone (or almost everyone) is successful in
identifying with their character during these critical moments. Hall has
a positively stunning, heart-wrenching breakdown on the game show,
Robards is chillingly effective as he croaks out his untold confessions,
and Walters is phenomenal throughout. However, the brunt of the
recognition deserves to be bestowed upon Mr. Tom Cruise, who delivers a
dazzling, high-voltage performance as Frank Mackey - the kinetic ball of
vivacious energy at the center of Anderson's amazing concoction.
The cast is astonishing - but you knew that already. The outrageous kick
behind `Magnolia' is writer-director Paul Thomas Anderson, a brilliant
filmmaker who shows infinite ambition to plumb the emotional depths of
this work in methods both extravagant and unique. Anderson received
endless praise for `Boogie Nights', his detailed account of pornographic
filmmaking in the 1970's. In `Magnolia', the director shows a keen and
thoughtful eye for pacing. At just over 3-hours in length, the film
could have been a tedious and pretentious experience, but it transforms
into a moving, thrilling and audaciously funny spectacle under
Anderson's wing. What David O. Russell did earlier this year with `Three
Kings', P.T. Anderson achieves again here. By the time a totally
outrageous, completely unexpected finale rolls around, you must
acknowledge the fact that Paul Thomas Anderson is a bold and ambitious
filmmaker, and `Magnolia' is a one-of-a-kind experience.
Another highlight is the soundtrack. Many scenes are accompanied by the
music of Aimee Mann, including one expertly integrated segment in which
the characters sing the lyrics of `Wise Up' in episodic fashion. The
musical score, by Jon Brion, blends seamlessly into the fast-moving
action in the 2nd act. But this is not necessarily a `viewer-friendly'
movie. I can tell you right now, many audience members will be utterly
confounded by the director's style - particularly the Biblical climax.
Those who get involved in the film, though, will realize the treasure
P.T. Anderson has delivered. `Magnolia' is a profound and effective
motion picture, and a monumental achievement in film.
Your Comments Appreciated! movieviews@hotmail.com
"Magnolia" is on my "Best & Worst of '99 - TOP TEN"
    http://Welcome.to/MovieViews
   MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton

Author
Michael Elliott
Christian Critic's Movie Parables - http://www.christiancritic.com
DIRECTED BY:      Paul Thomas Anderson
STARRING:         Tom Cruise, Jason Robards, Philip Baker Hall, Julianne
Moore, William H. Macy, John C. Reilly, Melora Walters
WRITTEN BY:       Paul Thomas Anderson
RATED:            R for strong language, drug use, sexuality, and some
violence
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:       Isaiah 43:25, Hebrews 8:12, Psalms 103:12
Take two old and dying men, a lifetime of regrets, a house full of sins,
a thoroughly despicable  man, enough lies, insecurities and other
character defects to keep a team of psychiatrists gainfully employed, then
add a inexplicable meteorological and amphibian-based phenomenon and you
will have summed up MAGNOLIA, the newest film from Paul Thomas Anderson
(BOOGIE NIGHTS).
The movie tells multiple stories, weaving them together, or overlapping
them during the course of its three hour running time.  Would that the
stories were worth the telling.
Earl Partridge (Jason Robards, A THOUSAND ACRES) is dying of cancer.
Bedridden, in much pain, it is obvious that his time is growing short.
His much younger wife played by Julianne Moore (AN IDEAL HUSBAND) is
surprised to find herself struggling with his impending death.  Having
married for money, she discovers that she has actually fallen in love with
the old guy and regrets having cheated and lied.
Earl regrets having cheated on his first wife and estranging himself from
his only son (Tom Cruise, EYES WIDE SHUT), now a misogynist self-help guru
who teaches men how to "Seduce and Destroy,"  His sexual and vulgar
perspective on male/female relationships is so over-the-top as to be
utterly unbelievable.
Meanwhile, Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall, THE INSIDER) is also dying of
cancer.  Not as physically incapacitated as Earl, Jimmy is still able to
perform his duties as the lovable host of a long-running quiz show which
pits adults against children.  The current whiz-quiz-kid is Stanley
Spector (Jeremy Blackman in his film debut) who is tired of the pressure
of performing and is willing to call it quits.  On the other hand, quiz
kid Donnie Smith (William Macy, MYSTERY MEN ) would like nothing more than
to return to the spotlight when he was a "somebody."  His pathetic life is
souring as he can no longer capitalize on his brief 15 minutes of fame
which Stanley is all too eager to relinquish.
Jimmy has his own family crisis as his drug-addict daughter (Melora
Walters, BOOGIE NIGHTS) refuses to have anything to do with him for
reasons  which are not disclosed to us until the end of the film. Grabbing
at one last attempt at happiness she reaches out to a softhearted cop
(John C. Reilly, NEVER BEEN KISSED) even as she tries to push herself away
from him because she deems herself not worthy of his affection.
This dysfunctional group carries on for what seems to be an interminable
two-thirds of the movie.  And then it gets worse, literally raining frogs.
Yes, frogs.  Assuming it to be an intended deus-ex-machina device, it is
an ineffective one because it doesn't seem to faze the characters much.
Oh, they may step gingerly around the splattered frog corpses littering
the streets, but otherwise, the frog shower didn't seem to change their
behavior or pattern of living (or dying).
There is simply too much going on in this movie and most of it is
distasteful to watch.  Mr. Anderson further obscures the film by
incorporating a loud and intrusive sound track that often drowned out the
dialogue, a character who apparently rapped a significant clue to a plot
development which was completely unintelligble, and a heavy handed segment
of "historical" occurances containing ironic twists which set up
absolutely nothing.
One of the recurring themes is found in a line Donnie quotes: "We may be
done with the past, but the past is not done with us."  This is an
absolute lie.  God is in the forgiveness business.  In fact, as we humbly
ask for forgiveness and repent or change our offending mindset, God's Word
says that He not only forgives, He also forgets.
"I, even I, am he that blotteth out thy transgressions for mine own sake,
and will not remember thy sins."  Isaiah 43:25 [KJV]
The spiritual one who keeps bringing up our unrighteous past is the same
one who wants to keep us in a state of condemnation.  Don't let him.  Next
time your spiritual adversary reminds you of your past, take great
pleasure in reminding him of his future.  He hates that.

Author
Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Warner Village (Birkenhead Conway Park)
Released in the UK by Entertainment Film Distributors on 24 March, 2000; 
certificate 18; 179 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Paul Thomas Anderson; produced by Joanne Sellar.
Written by Paul Thomas Anderson.
Photographed by Robert Elswit; edited by Dylan Tichenor.
"They f--k you up, your mum and dad. They may not mean to, but they do. They 
fill you with the faults they had and add some extra, just for you."
--Philip Larkin, "This be the Verse"
"If you refuse to let them go, behold, I will plague all your country."
--Exodus, Chapter 8 Verse 2
Both these quotes have meaning in relation to "Magnolia", a film of bold 
dramatic strokes from which the sins of fathers, sons and lovers come pouring 
onto the audience in a torrent of stifling intensity. In most scenes it is 
raining. By the end of the movie, this water will stop, to make way for a 
biblical plague.
Because the film is a tapestry of pathetic Los Angeles lives, epic in length 
and emotion, we could compare it to Robert Altman's "Short Cuts" (1993). But 
the work, by "Boogie Nights" creator Paul Thomas Anderson, is not that 
distant or darkly comic; it's a penetrating tragedy comprised of painful, 
sweaty close-ups. Jason Robards and Philip Baker Hall both play influential 
showbiz players at different stages in terminal cancer, who want to repent 
for being lousy husbands and parents. Robards's son is Frank TJ Mackey (Tom 
Cruise), a self-help guru who feigns confidence to give dangerous single men 
lectures on how to be effective misogynists. Hall's daughter, played by 
Melora Walters, is less skilled at masking her emotional scars. She uses 
cocaine and self-destructive sex to punctuate a life of screaming and weeping.
Robards produces and Hall presents a television game show entitled "What Do 
Kids Know?" One former star contestant, Donnie Smith (William H. Macy), has 
grown up into a dangerously insecure loser after being mistreated by his 
parents. A current one, Stanley Spector (Jeremy Blackman), looks like a 
candidate for the same path.
Around these characters are good people who understand the pain and want to 
help. John C. Reilly's widower cop will love and listen to Walters and Macy. 
Philip Seymour Hoffman, as Robards's nurse, may not succeed in reconciling 
the old man with anyone, but he can pray for and forgive him. Julianne Moore 
is like a one-woman Greek chorus representing everyone else in the cast; her 
character's role in the story is inconsequential, and her job is to bookend 
the scenes of others with tense looks, strained eyes and frantic breath. Like 
the film's constantly climactic music, she appears to be waiting for 
everything to come to a devastating halt.
Somehow hope and redemption shine through the film's closing moments, but 
even without it, "Magnolia" is compelling, not depressing, because Anderson 
moulds the material into a dreamlike flow. His camera spins and jolts with 
the freedom of the imagination, and transitions between situations are 
connected by audio-visual motifs. In one shot a pack of Camels sits on a 
bedside table. Cut to a pharmacy whose shelves are filled by nicotine 
replacement therapies. Bizet's "Carmen" is mentioned among one set of 
characters, and when we meet up with the next, an aria from the opera is 
blaring on the sound track.
Many contemporary films deal with loneliness, bitterness and despair -- 
"Short Cuts", "American Beauty" and "Happiness" are among the most acclaimed. 
"Magnolia" is better than all of them because its confidence and passion is 
so much louder. At times, it creates emotions so extreme it's like our hair 
is being pulled. But I don't go to the movies to feel unmoved.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Author
David N. Butterworth
        Anyone unconvinced of Paul Thomas Anderson's talent following the
critical success of "Boogie Nights" (the film which put Mark Wahlberg's
"talent" on the map) need look no further than his latest film, "Magnolia."
        "Magnolia" stars Julianne Moore, William H. Macy, John C. Reilly,
Melora Walters, Philip Seymour Hoffman, and Philip Baker Hall, all of whom
appeared in "Boogie Nights."  Utilizing a stock company of repertory
regulars is an approach employed by the likes of Robert Altman and Alan
Rudolph, and it works well for Anderson too; every single member of his
ensemble delights in profound and significant ways.  "Magnolia" also stars
Jason Robards and Tom Cruise, and they complement Anderson's veterans
extremely nicely.
        In a story of intersecting lives and emotions, Robards is bed
ridden and dying of cancer, Moore is his emotional wreck of a trophy wife
who's finally learned to love him, and Hoffman is his sensitive and
beleaguered nurse.  Cruise, in a dynamic performance, plays a misogynistic
motivational speaker with turbulent ties to the dying man.  In parallel
story threads, Reilly is a San Fernando Valley cop who falls for the
coke-addicted daughter (Walters) of a TV game show host (Hall), and Macy
appears as a former game show prodigy with love in his heart for a
tinsel-toothed barkeep.
        As you can probably tell from these brief character descriptions,
"Magnolia" is structured more as a series of vignettes than a traditional
central narrative yet many of these disparate storylines come together very
untraditionally in the film's breathtaking final act.  The film is a little
over three hours long but you'd never know it; the minutes simply fly by.
        Anderson, some say an upstart of a filmmaker at 29, wrote as well
as directed "Magnolia," yet the film plays out with the sophistication and
maturity of someone beyond his years.  Since "Magnolia" was supposedly
inspired by a lyric from an Aimee Mann song, it makes perfect sense that
Anderson would employ the talents of the former 'Til Tuesday lead singer,
whose melancholy refrains are featured predominantly on the film's
soundtrack.  That soundtrack also features impressive music by Jon Brion
(Anderson's "Hard Eight").  His insistent score is especially effective in
its ability to heighten passions, pulling the characters together with its
urgent layering across scenes.
        In addition to drawing superlative performances from his cast,
Anderson takes two major risks in the film, sequences so against the grain
you'd expect some conventional bigwig to have exorcised them from the final
cut.  The fact that they meld perfectly with the escalating human drama
only further substantiates Anderson's skill as a writer and director of
unique and remarkable vision.
        Unfortunately, "Magnolia" was released in Philadelphia one week too
late to be included on my list of outstanding films of 1999, but even this
early in the new year I can guarantee it will make it onto my best films of
2000 list.  As a candidate for the best film of the year, it's gonna be a
tough act to beat.
Got beef?  Visit "La Movie Boeuf"
online at http://members.dca.net/dnb

Author
Ron Small
Starring: John C. Reily, Tom Cruise, Melinda Dillon, Jeremy Blackman, April
Grace, Julianne Moore, Phillip Seymour Hoffman, Jason Robards, Phillip Baker
Hall, William H. Macy, Melora Walters
In MAGNOLIA, Tom Cruise struts and jives, pervading his boyish voice with the
inflection of a soulful preacher, William H. Macy babbles about his past, and
Melora Walters snorts a lot of coke. Like a Robert Altman film (McCABE AND MRS.
MILLER, SHORT CUTS), Paul Thomas Anderson's (BOOGIE NIGHTS) interests lie in
communities, and the people who co-exist within them. He leaps between
disparate narratives and characters (all with comparative issues), the audience
instinctively assuming that he will eventually bring everyone together for the
finale (as is usually the case with such a film). But Anderson has something
more complex up his sleeve. Without giving too much away, MAGNOLIA is not so
much about its characters as it is about the volatile life that surrounds them.
And it's not particularly interested in traditional plot lines, but
thematically, everything relates. The film concludes in a manner, that made me
think of the lack of supremacy we have over our lives.
As the millennium approached, various religious zealots predicted the end of
the world. These knuckleheads made the assumption that Earth would be no more
because of a passage in the bible hinting that "something" would happen
following the commencement of the millennium. Of course nothing did, and
besides we have no idea when the millennium is; date and time are man-made and
as such we're not on any schedule! (Please excuse me for being so obvious, but
trust me, this half-hearted semi-rant is going somewhere). These kind of
sentiments have much to do with man's desire to be in control of his existence
when really he's just another "spoke on the wheel", to quote one of the
characters from MAGNOLIA. We like to think that we have control over our lives,
but the sad truth is that we have very little say in the way things ultimately
pan out: a plane could crash into our house while we lay in bed, a psycho path
might gun us down in a shopping mall, an earthquake may trap us under a
building. Life is a series of moments where we often must put our trust in the
world that we inhabit.
I don't believe that most audiences will walk out of MAGNOLIA liking it as much
as I did, or getting from it what I did. Some will say that its ending is
irrational, a "cop out", but it resonated with me, and I feel as if I "get"
what Anderson was doing. However, one somewhat vocal member of the audience did
not. This man chortled loudly at the films concluding moments, obnoxiously
proclaiming "This is ridiculous!" I don't think it is. The ending coheres with
the basic theme the movie sets up in its opening, and though it is not
traditional, it does succeed.
Often when a filmmaker attempts to construct his film solely out of themes, the
end result is manipulative and pretentious. But Anderson puts just as much care
into his very human characters as he does into his "plot". His story takes
place in the "real" world, so when astonishing things happen it's just as
stupefying for the characters as it is for us. They exist in their own hectic
worlds, never privy to everything that occurs around them. But we see it all,
and what it leads up to will only make sense to some of us.
So what is this thing about? It's about our past and how it haunts us no matter
how hard we try to escape it, and it's about a redemption that for most never
comes. But we expect it to come. Maybe those who react negatively to this film
do so because they didn't know what to expect. There is nothing predictable or
formulaic about MAGNOLIA. Anderson has brazenly gone in a direction that I
think few will comprehend (judging from the plethora of puzzled faces that I
noticed, following the screening). Audiences may like being force-fed surprise
endings (even if at times they defy logic: THE USUAL SUSPECTS), but when
presented with something that is seemingly inexplicable, they would rather
dismiss the entire film than put their thinking caps on.
Anderson introduces his intentions with a prologue about chance and coincidence
that is so dazzling and free from usual film constrictions, I found myself
marveling at its propulsive cleverness. Other scenes left me with the same
breathless wonder.
The characters are introduced in a manic ten-minute montage. Jason Robards is
an aged producer, plagued with a cancer that is slowly draining the life out of
him. Julianne Moore (essentially acting out her BOOGIE NIGHTS coke frenzy scene
for the duration of this film) plays his trophy wife. Robards is looked after
by a kind, plump nurse, Phil Parama (a slack jawed Phillip Seymour Hoffman).
Tom Cruise is Robards' estranged son, a wolfish "self help guru" who instructs
horny losers, in a profane workshop on how to pick up chicks. Cruise is
constantly over the top screaming out lines like, "Respect the cock!" with such
conviction he could be a hopped up Moses relaying the TEN COMMANDMENTS to his
people. It's a brave performance, but one that doesn't always work. Cruise has
a virtuous little boy voice, and to hear him acting with such macho indignation
is a bit like watching David Schwimmer in the Andrew Dice Clay role. Though
Cruise does put his trademark grin to good use as a mask of narcissistic
endearment; he seems to be saying, "Yeah I'm an asshole, but I'm just too damn
charming".
Another character is afflicted with cancer, this one game show host, Jimmy
Gator (Phillip Baker Hall). Hall speaks in an urbane, grandfatherly pitch,
textured with wisdom and worldliness. He has a likeable demeanor, and as such
it's effectively dismaying when we discover his past indiscretions. Gator's
pug-nosed, crumpled visage seems to be slowly deteriorating in guilt. He
remains estranged from his cokehead daughter, Rose (Melora Walters). Rose is so
traumatized by events in her past, that she denies herself any kind of
emotional relationship, only engaging in purely sexual ones. This doesn't stop
a kind-hearted cop (John C. Reily) from falling for her. If anyone has the most
screen time it's Reily, and that's a good thing; the actor is adept at playing
naďve, yet admirable characters. Along with Hoffman, Reily offers glimmers of
hope amid the human wreckage permeating Anderson's tale.
The Game Show is an old fashioned Quiz show, in which child geniuses' match
wits against challenging adults. The current child star is Stanley Spector (an
emerald eyed Jeremy Blackman). Spector is idly in the process of becoming
estranged from his loutish father. Then finally, there is a jittery William H.
Macy as former whiz kid Donnie Smith, now just plain old current loser, Donnie
Smith.
Anderson shoots this with the same audacious camera motions he employed in
BOOGIE NIGHTS. At times he seems too in love with his own film making
abilities. He utilizes expansive pans, and whooshing, stylized hand-held
movements, simultaneously jacking up the volume on the soundtrack at just the
right moment for impact. While that's a sure way to increase the energy in one
scene, it becomes a bit exhausting if over done, as is occasionally the case.
The film has constant climaxes, realizations, and emotional outbursts all
handled relatively well. In one affecting sequence Blackman breaks down on air,
directing his malice at Jimmy Gator for heaping so much pressure on innocent
children. It's a distressing moment, because the kid has no idea how to convey
his feelings; they just come bursting out of him like a flood of pent up
sentiments. The reaction is substantially real, and one that thankfully isn't
accompanied by a bullying Hollywood score.
Though MAGNOLIA is chock full of great actors (some of whom doing their best
work here) it is Anderson who deserves much of the credit. His dialogue and the
way the actors use it, is authentic; the characters have a certain middle class
vagueness about them. They stutter, stumble over words, and interrupt each
other like genuine people. They talk about inconsequential things, and they
don't always communicate their emotions in ways that we're used to seeing.
Anderson takes a big chance with this movie; it's not typically mainstream, and
not one that even many critics have agreed on. But it's well worth it for
adventurous filmgoers. At three hours, MAGNOLIA is a constantly surprising epic
that bridges the gap between the believable and the unbelievable.
 http://www.geocities.com/incongruity98   Reeling  (Ron Small)

Author
Homer Yen
Have you ever watched an advertisement on late night
TV, perhaps an infomercial, and wondered how those
guys could actually be the dynamos that they seem to
be.  I remember the incredulous pitches for how to
make millions in real estate.  The speaker would say
how he was once a penniless immigrant but now had
amassed a fortune.  With an ounce of ambition and his
tutelage, you too could earn enough to purchase
oceanfront property, a yacht, and a slew of exotic
cars.
In `Magnolia,' there is another such dynamo named
Frank Mackey (Tom Cruise).  With his high-powered
charisma, his ads boast that he can win over the
hearts of any woman.   And, if you come to his
seminar, he'll teach you all of his secrets.  Just
call 1-877-TAME HER and he'll show you all of his
tricks including how to feign sincerity and how to
make her fulfill your every desire.  This is truly a
person that has feigned much like the
once-penniless-immigrant-turned real-estate-mogul. 
The life that he has created is a manifestation of
terrific imagination.  He has worked hard to develop
an identity for others to see.  He says the right
things, wears the right clothes, and talks to the
right people.  But his whole life is nothing but a
fragile foundation of vanity and buried secrets. 
Unlock those secrets, and his foundation crumbles. 
What would make Frank's foundation crumble?  Perhaps
it will be an inquisitive reporter.  Or, it may be
confronting a father that had abandoned him but now
lies on his deathbed.  Neither Frank nor anyone else
can ever be prepared for such a jolt.
Frank's is one of many stories that are happening
simultaneously in the world of `Magnolia.'  Several
interlocking vignettes are at play, and all of them
are variations on a theme.  Julianne Moore plays a
neurotic and faithless wife.  Veteran game show host
Jimmy Gator (Phillip Baker Hall) has just learned that
he is suffering from cancer and doesn't have long to
live.  An overeager father (Michael Bowen) maddeningly
drives his son to excel.  Former whiz kid Donnie Smith
(William H. Macy) is a pathetic loser who thinks that
braces will help him secure the love of a muscular
bartender.  And there's also a caring officer (John C.
Reilly) who falls in love with a drug addict. 
Foundation shaking events will occur for all of the
characters. 
Structurally, this is a very good film.  Despite it
being a film where many of the characters are related
by coincidence, the film does an excellent job making
sure that all of the various story lines are working
in unison.  In fact, the middle hour showcases some of
this year's most energetic and extroverted acting
scenes, especially Cruise as the cocksure sex guru and
Moore as the unstable housewife.  And this why critics
will rally around this kind of film.  It's certainly
ambitious work and worthy of a nomination for Director
Paul Thomas Anderson.
However, my job is not to extol its production values
(which it has plenty of), but to let you know whether
this is a film that most of us would find
entertaining.  And to that, I would have to say no'. 
This is an Oscar-seeking melodrama, filled with
emotion, deathbed scenes and turbulence.  These
threads also converge in a way that I could not
understand, and should you wish to see this film, I
will have to let you draw your own conclusions.  As
for my own opinion, this is a 3-hour film that is
recommended to only the most avid moviegoers who like
their films to be a bravura combination of absurdity,
innovation and chance.  That's not me.

Author
Scott Renshaw
MAGNOLIA
(New Line)
Starring:  Tom Cruise, Philip Baker Hall, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Julianne
Moore, Jeremy Blackman, John C. Reilly, Melora Walters, William H. Macy,
Jason Robards, Melinda Dillon.
Screenplay:  Paul Thomas Anderson.
Producers:  Joanne Sellar and Paul Thomas Anderson.
Director:  Paul Thomas Anderson.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, drug use, sexual situations, nudity, violence,
adult themes).
Running Time:  179 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     At one pivotal point in MAGNOLIA -- one of several pivotal points in
Paul Thomas Anderson's epic of human connection and disconnection -- a
woman sits alone in her apartment, singing along to a song. At first it
seems she's singing along to her stereo, until Anderson cuts to another 
character singing the same song. He does this half a dozen more times,
capturing every one of his principal characters accompanying the haunting
original Aimee Mann composition "Wise Up." As the characters struggle
with moments of painful realization, they become individual voices in a
mournful chorus looking for forgiveness, reconciliation and redemption.
     That sequence in MAGNOLIA is one of the year's best pieces of
film-making, and I could name a dozen more moments from the film that will
be sticking in my memory. If Anderson had pulled all those pieces of
film-making together into a stronger whole, MAGNOLIA might have been the
year's best film, instead of just a very good one. It's certainly an
ambitious work, following many characters through one rainy day in the San
Fernando Valley. Earl Partridge (Jason Robards) is dying of cancer,
inspiring his young wife Linda (Julianne Moore) to guilt-ridden thoughts
and inspiring Earl's caretaker Phil (Philip Seymour Hoffman) to seek out
Earl's estranged son, self-help guru Frank T. J. Mackey (Tom Cruise). Game
show host Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall) is also dying of cancer and also
has an estranged child, a coke-addicted daughter named Claudia (Melora
Walters) who becomes the object of affection for good-natured cop Jim
Kurring (John C. Reilly). Meanwhile, quiz show whiz kid Stanley (Jeremy
Blackman) tries to get through another show, while has-been whiz kid
Donnie Smith (William H. Macy) tries to get through another day.
     Anderson sets out to connect his stories thematically with a wild
prologue involving three unrelated tales of coincidence and chance. In a
way, the whole thing is little more than an extended attempt to justify
the film's most surreal device (more on which later). It's also undeniably
compelling, charged by Anderson's kitchen sink visual style. And for three
hours, that's what MAGNOLIA does: It delivers thrilling scene after
thrilling scene which, by all rights, should simply feel self-indulgent. 
Tom Cruise is positively electrifying as the motivational speaker who
teaches a course in male sexual conquest called "Search and Destroy" (it's
the best performance of his career until he once again makes the mistake
of crying on screen). Reilly is wonderful, both in his awkward
flirtations with the hopped-up Claudia and in his trite straight-arrow
response to a young would-be rapper. And Macy once again finds the wounded
humanity in a pathetic figure.
     When Anderson nails these characters at their most vulnerable and
conflicted, he creates sensational scenes for actors. MAGNOLIA plays like
a cross between a symphony and a jazz jam, with solo showcases building
toward splendidly edited crescendos. The only thing missing is an anchor,
something that ties Anderson's multiple story lines together in a way that
makes them greater than the sum of their parts. It shouldn't have been
that difficult considering the parallels Anderson sets up (present day
whiz kid and past whiz kid, the two cancer patients and their angry
progeny). And yes, sins of the fathers play a role in most of the
characters' lives. It's obvious Anderson wants us to feel a connection. I
just don't think he pulls it off, giving more attention to the individual
trespasses and recriminations than to the links between them.
     There's sure to be much talk about Anderson's most audacious attempt
to pull his story together, a cloudburst in which something besides rain
falls from the sky in a torrent. I'm not about to guess what Anderson was
thinking by loosing a Biblical plague upon the San Fernando Valley, nor
will I pretend the credulity-stretching trick doesn't feel more like a
grand gag than a dramatic fulcrum. There's also something about it that
just plain works -- maybe just as damn-the-torpedoes film-making, maybe as
acknowledgement of how primal forces can throttle you into re-evaluating
your life. That, in a nutshell, is the wonderful frustration of MAGNOLIA.
Part of you wants to expose Anderson as a philosophical poseur, and the
other half can't stop watching everything he throws at the screen.

Author
Marty Mapes
***1/2 (out of 4) MAGNOLIA is a masterpiece of structure. Some parts are
imperfect, some of the seams are  badly stitched, but the finished piece
is a work of art.
MAGNOLIA is ambitious. Ten characters share center stage, and some of
them never meet. But by carefully following the chain, you can get from
one to the next. Anderson's great script and Dylan Tichenor's editing
gives each character the right amount of time. The ensemble acting is
superb.
One story is Frank T.J. Mackey's. Mackey (Tom Cruise) runs seminars for
men called "Seduce and Destroy." He teaches men how to take what they
want from women. He's a real jerk and Cruise gives him believable
dimension. During the seminar's lunch break he gives an interview to
Guinivere (**), who catches him off guard by asking penetrating
questions about the "real" Frank Mackey. He returns to the afternoon
session worked up by his frustrating interview.
Another story is Jim Kurring's. Kurring (James C. Reilly) is a lonely
cop. He talks to himself in his patrol car with the flat philosophical
patter you'd expect to hear on COPS. His day gets more interesting when
he responds to a disturbance at Claudia's (Melora Walters) apartment. At
first sight, he decides he likes this girl, and she seems to like him
too. As he tries to start the relationship, his nervous tension builds
Jimmy Gator is a quiz show host. Now cancer is forcing him to retire. A
combination of alcohol and pain cause his last live performance to go
very badly. Also the whiz-kid contestant (Jeremy Blackman) refuses to
play the final round, stressing him even more.
Most of the other characters have similarly bad days. Halfway through, a
title card appears that says "99% humidity." In other words, something's
got to give, something has to burst.
Anderson keeps the pressure building throughout the movie. For one
thing, the music on the soundtrack is relentless. There is never a
moment of silence, there is always a song or music playing over the
action.
Also, the editing keeps the film moving. The characters are introduced
at a whirlwind pace, and except for a few long stops at Earl Partridge's
(Jason Robards') house, the characters' stories are intercut briskly.
There are a few basic problems with the movie that took me by surprise.
For example, when Tom Cruise leans forward or backward in his key scene,
the focus doesn't follow him perfectly. In film school, that kind of
carelessness would get your movie rejected.  
Also, some of the mid-level editing seemed off, like the too-long scenes
of Partridge and his nurse Phil (Philip Seymour Hoffman), or like the
too-intense showdown between Donnie (William H. Macy) and his boss
(Alfred Molina).
And yet, none of these potential problems are critical. They give the
movie a unique texture, like bubbles in blown glass. Somehow they were
simply not important enough to worry about, either for Anderson or for
his audience.
The artist's technique isn't quite polished enough for him to be a
master craftsman, but it doesn't matter because he has created a unique
work of art.
"I suppose on a clear day you can see the class struggle" 
-- Katrin Cartlidge, Career Girls

Author
Michael Dequina
A faceless narrator ruminates on the nature of chance and fate by
telling of three different inexplicable occurrences through time.  The
most interesting anecdote is one where a young man's attempt at a
suicidal fall is botched mid-plunge--when he ends up the victim of a
murder to which he was an accessory.  The convoluted mechanics of this
strange--make that _freak_--occurrence are analyzed in exhaustive detail,
complete with a visual breakdown by telestrator.  It's not exactly the
most obvious way to open any film about the anguished lives of a
cross-section of people in Los Angeles' San Fernando Valley, but in terms
of Paul Thomas Anderson's _Magnolia_, it is the perfect curtain- and
eyebrow-raiser for three hours of the director's astonishingly powerful
and audacious vision.
Anderson follows that bold prologue with an introductory sequence that
can only be described as being cinematically alive.  As a TV blares the
ridiculously macho propaganda of male self-help guru Frank T.J. Mackey
(Tom Cruise), one by one we're introduced to the characters, storylines,
and relationships that intertwine over one eventful 24-hour period
detailed in the film.  Cancer-stricken television producer Earl Partridge
(Jason Robards) is on his deathbed, being tended to by his nurse, Phil
Parma (Philip Seymour Hoffman), as his much younger trophy wife, Linda
(Julianne Moore) searches in vain for a way to cope.  Elsewhere in the
Valley is another terminal cancer victim, Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker
Hall), who hasn't yet let his estranged, drug-addicted daughter Claudia
(Melora Walters) know about his condition.  In the meantime, he continues
his long-running hosting duties on the popular kids-versus-adults quiz
show _What_Do_Kids_Know?_, whose current champion is child genius Stanley
Spector (Jeremy Blackman).  Serving as a counterpoint to Stanley's
progression is the downward slide of Donnie Smith (William H. Macy), a
former champion of the same show back in the '60s.  Patrolling the Valley
streets while talking to an invisible partner is Officer Jim Kurring
(John C. Reilly).  
This highly kinetic sequence, fueled by energized editing and camera
work, is ultimately held together by the song that plays in the
background, a tune that succinctly sums up the main feeling of the
characters and the film itself: Aimee Mann's cover of "One"--as in, "one
is the loneliest number."  Isolation is the primary theme of _Magnolia_,
and the overwhelming pain that comes with the state its primary mood; as
the characters each seek out connection and comfort, Anderson masterfully
uses music to express that which is neither seen nor spoken.  For a
non-musical film, _Magnolia_ is highly dependent on the music; there is
nary a moment where either a song (usually by Mann, contributed seven to
the film) or Jon Brion's instrumental score is playing in the background.
 Sometimes Anderson even has score and songs playing concurrently, and a
number of times the music takes the foreground and the dialogue recedes
into the background (most notably in the film's final scenes); both are
bold moves, and they prove to be highly effective in showing the urgency
of emotion that burns beneath the surface.
But no example of Anderson's use of music is as ingenius as in one
bound-to-be-discussed scene that occurs about two-thirds into the film. 
As all the characters appear to be at their lowest, most uncertain point,
the action completely stops and each person, regardless of where they
are, sings along to Mann's somber "Wise Up."  The tune is not playing on
anyone's stereo as source music; it simply plays on the film's
soundtrack, and everyone relates their pain through the song, whose
chorus goes, "It's not going to stop 'til you wise up."  The idea sounds
ridiculous and almost overly cutesy on paper, but the scene sends chills
while watching it unfold onscreen.  When the signature line is sung for
the final time, with the altered lyric "It's not going to stop, so just
_give_up_"--it packs a stunning wallop.
Of course, such an experimental, for lack of a better term, "stunt"
would not work if the audience does not care for any of the characters. 
While _Magnolia_ runs three hours, Anderson still has only so much screen
time to divide between its large canvas of players, and it's a testimony
to his writing and directing skill and the ability of the actors that
everyone comes across as a fully-realized human being.  The cast is
absolutely flawless, with Cruise undoubtedly set to get the lion's share
of attention for his showy, likely-to-be-Oscar-nominated work.  The
recognition would be well-deserved, but I found myself even more
impressed with others in the ensemble.  Moore is particularly strong,
gradually revealing the tenderness that lies beneath her character's
shrewish bitterness; the moment where Linda is finally able to be honest
about her feelings to another and to herself is shattering.  Walters and
Reilly are called on to navigate the film's central romantic thread, and
their oddball characters' pairing is  at once comically eccentric and
genuinely endearing.  Then there's the bound-to-be-unsung hero by the
name of Philip Seymour Hoffman.  The role of loyal and nice nurse Phil is
far from the film's flashiest (not surprisingly, that distinction goes to
Cruise's), but it's one of those critical parts that, if done completely
wrong, could short-circuit the entire film.  That Hoffman's work is
likely to go unrecognized says everything about the quality of his
performance.
The idea of the inexplicable--and Anderson's courageously go-for-broke
creative approach--comes to a head during the film's climax, when
something indeed beyond reason takes place, serving as a unifying force
between all the characters and plotlines.  I will not give it away, but
the development not quite as out-of-left-field as some people suggest; it
is, in fact, very subtly foreshadowed throughout the course of the movie.
 Nonetheless, it _is_ quite a jarring turn, but by that point I was
willing to go anywhere the boundlessly imaginative Anderson was leading. 
That's the sign of a true film artist at work, and the proof is the
moving, magnificent masterwork that is _Magnolia_.
Michael Dequina
twotrey@juno.com | michael_jordan@geocities.com |
jordan_host@sportsmail.com | mrbrown@iname.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site:  http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CinemaReview Magazine:  http://www.CinemaReview.com
on ICQ: #25289934  |  on AOL Instant Messenger: MrBrown23


Author
Ross Anthony
You know those plate jugglers? The ones that start a plate spinning up on a
bendy rod. That's impressive enough, isn't it? But they set up another and
another, until there are nine plates tottering on sticks all over the stage.
Then you're not only impressed, but you start to feel like your attention or
your muse or your thoughts themselves are like wobbling plates. You slowly
come to realize that the able juggler has a plan larger than tableware ...
you've been set spinning on a bendy rod. Paul Thomas Anderson is that
juggler.
Showing finesse for film like none we've seen in a long time, Anderson
conducts a nine-ring circus and makes it look easy. With well over a hundred
big films produced a year, so many would-be-classics topple as they
approached climax. Perhaps it's a lack of directorial discipline, perhaps
it's creative control. No matter to the viewer, when the giant falls -- it
makes a horrible crashing sound!
"Magnolia" is so large it really climaxes twice, Anderson reveling in each
peak, where other artists stumble. Instead of dreading the turbulence, like
a pilot in a hurricane, Anderson relishes that intensity, plays it out with
all his might, rolling with the thunder instead of fighting it or
challenging it. Then grinning peacefully proud as it resolves. Never a
moment where he feels out of control. Never a doubt that a spinning plate
might have fallen.
Mainly character and relationship driven, Anderson's cast rises to the
occasion of this masterpiece. Tom Cruise will seduce and destroy you, Jason
Robards will have you hanging on the edge of his death bed, and John C.
Reilly will win you over in less than two minutes of screen time rising from
his knees after prayer with a slap of hands -- a personal high five to
himself.
The audio mix favors the music (volume-wise), glossing the production with a
music video feel. Anderson admits Aimee Mann songs (former lead singer of
"Till Tuesday") provided more than just a few seeds for the patiently
blooming "Magnolia." Her fans will love this film.
Anderson was careful not to tell too much of the story in its previews and
ads -- I will not defeat that effort. I will tell you this, "Magnolia" isn't
the dark moody indie type film I expected it to be by the black advert. Nor
is it an action attraction. It is, simply put, an entertainment event ...
like spending the day at an amusement park or (I don't know) parachuting
from a plane. Its complexity dangles on the edge of the human brain's
capacity for input. When the movie ended, I was starving -- though I'd had a
huge meal prior. So plan your day accordingly. You've been warned. Also,
bring aspirin -- it's pretty intense.
Magnolia. Copyright Š 1999. Rated R.
Starring Jeremy Blackman, Tom Cruise, Melinda Dillon, Philip Baker Hall,
Philip Seymour Hoffman, Ricky Jay, William H. Macy, Alfred Molina, Julianne
Moore, John C. Reilly, Jason Robards and Melora Walters.
Written and Directed by Paul Thomas Anderson.
Produced by Joanne Sellar at New Line.
Grade..........................A+
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Christopher Null
     Sooner or later, every director makes his SHORT CUTS.
     Paul Thomas Anderson (BOOGIE NIGHTS) only waiting until his third
film to make his, an over-three-hour epic with at least 10 major
characters in almost as many separate story lines.  And thanks to those
characters, every one a rich mystery burning with secrets, MAGNOLIA is a
smashing success.
     MAGNOLIA has one of the greatest openings I've ever seen in a
film.  Narrated by Ricky Jay, who also has a small role in the movie, we
are led through a few short examples of strange coincidence, allegedly
real events from the past.  Whether or not they are true (one involves
the old story of a boy who attempts suicide by jumping from his roof,
only to be shot in the stomach by accident on the way down, thus being
murdered), they set the tone for the far more bizarre events to come.
     And again, it's those characters that drive MAGNOLIA along.  There
are far too many players to list, but the highlights include Julianne
Moore as the unhinged and much-younger bride of a dying older man.
William H. Macy as a once-famous 1960's quiz show star, now an
unemployable loser.  Tom Cruise as Frank "T.J." Mackey, an over-the-top
guru of female seduction.  And my favorite, John C. Reilly as a bumbling
and lovelorn LAPD officer looking for a meaningful relationship -- on
the job.  How these characters all come together is what makes MAGNOLIA
so much fun.
     It's unfortunate that the sheer, ass-numbing length of MAGNOLIA
tends to drag it down at times.  Most annoying is the fact that Anderson
gives virtually every character a long, drawn-out soliloquy to speak.
Invariably these are lost on an audience more interested in keeping the
plot moving.  There's even an inexplicable moment toward the end of the
movie when all the characters sing along to a song on the radio
together, although none of them are in the same place.  As an old friend
of mine would say, "What's up with THAT!?"
     And of course, as with any three-hour movie, maintaining a solid
theme from beginning to end is tough.  MAGNOLIA rolls its opening
credits to the tune of "One Is the Loneliest Number" and begins as a
study of exactly that.  By the end, it's become a movie about redemption
and forgiveness, a trend that PULP FICTION launched and has since been
done to death in countless films.
     And that's too bad, because otherwise MAGNOLIA is a world-class
film that would have been a shoo-in for the best of the year.
Director: Paul Thomas Anderson
Producer: Joanne Sellar
Writer: Paul Thomas Anderson
Starring: William H. Macy, Julianne Moore, Jim Beaver, Jeremy Blackman,
Michael Bowen, Tom Cruise, Melinda Dillon, Philip Baker Hall, Philip
Seymour Hoffman, Felicity Huffman, Brad Hunt, Ricky Jay, Emmanuel
Johnson, John C. Reilly, Jason Robards, Melora Walters
---
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Strange things happen. I spent my morning buzzing about being named as one
of "USA Today's" hot sites, got canned for the first time in my life in the
afternoon, and saw this film during the evening. After the movie, everything
just seemed...well, peaceful. What a beautiful movie. Should we cling to our
pasts, forgive our loved ones, treat others as we would like to be treated
or do we have little choice in any of the stuff that really goes on in our
lives? Writer/director P.T. Anderson takes us through an interesting journey
across the halls of chance, coincidence and fate.
PLOT:
This film follows the lives of various intertwining individuals during a
period of 24 hours in the San Fernando Valley.
CRITIQUE:
A wonderfully crafted picture, this movie sweeps you through the lives of
many interesting characters, develops several extremely memorable sequences
which will likely stick in your mind for years to come, and offers many of
today's top character actors in top form. And yes, that includes Tom Cruise
who delivers a kick ass showing, with one of his most unique performances in
years (And tops Brad Pitt in upper-body development, believe it or
not...wow, what a bod!). It is to note that this film is not for everyone,
and is another one of this year's infamous 3-hour+ movies, but one that is
in my opinion, totally worth its value in time. In fact, I don't remember
one particular scene in this film which did not grasp my complete and
undivided attention. The movie itself starts off with some "classic" P.T.
Anderson camera tricks that should automatically suck you into his game,
develops many an interesting story line across various well-established
three-dimensional characters, and ends off with one of the most bizarre
sequences ever put to screen. Some people have been heard to complain about
this ending, or the general esoteric nature of the film, but I enjoyed its
surreal conclusion and just loved every bit of this movie and its poignant
messages on life, love, forgiveness, infidelity, the past, dealing with the
present and chance.
Of course, all of these serious subjects were tackled admirably by a
formidable crew including extremely solid performances by little Timmy
Cruise, the always-reliable Philip Baker Hall and William H. Macy, and a
superb showing by Melora Walters. Julianne Moore was her usual solid self,
but I couldn't help but feel like she had already played this drugged-up
character before. The soundtrack was another successful supporting layer of
this film, as was the creative eye from P.T. Anderson and the overall
magical feel of the movie. I truly fell in love with the style of this film
and its many intertwining stories and characters. As soon as the movie was
over, I wanted to see it again and revisit the characters one more time. In
fact, I can't wait to see it again after discussing its many meanings with
my movie geek friends. Is everything left to chance? Will your past always
affect your present? Does forgiveness and acceptance play a part in it all?
A lot of puzzles, a lot of interpretations, a lot of engaging characters,
and most of all, a lot of genuine entertainment. This film is apparently not
intended for everyone, as witnessed by several of the walkouts during my own
screening, but definitely a keeper for all fans of character-driven dramas
laced with a tiny bit of humor and surreal fantasy. Love it or hate it, I
think we could all agree that P.T. Anderson has quickly become synonymous
with a man whose workings ooze extreme originality and excitement.
Can't wait to see his next pic. Great movie! Easily one of the year's best.

Author
Curtis Edmonds
MAGNOLIA:  The Really, Really Loud Music of Chance
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Magnolia professes to be a movie about coincidence and chance, so I'll
give you a coincidence.  Saturday evening, a day in the life.  Do I go
catch the nine o'clock Magnolia showing at the Lincoln 6 or find some
other form of harmless entertainment at home?
Then the noise starts.  Boom Boom Boom BOOM.  Boom Boom Boom BOOM.  The
noise of my reprobate neighbor playing his stereo too loudly again.  All
I can hear is the bass line coming right through the wall, but that's
enough -- especially because he always plays the same song, with the
same monotonous beat.  I could bang on his door (yet again) or complain
to the apartment complex folks (yet again) or call the cops (which I
haven't done yet, but may have to) or go see Magnolia.  Magnolia seemed,
at the time, to be the lesser of the four evils.
Magnolia not only features a scene where a cop is called to check on a
noisy neighbor with an overloud stereo (there's your coincidence) but
it's got to be a contender for some Worst Use of a Soundtrack Award.
Magnolia has the obligatory rock-and-roll soundtrack, played at full
screech, of course.  That in itself is not so bad, but director Paul
Thomas Anderson frequently lets the soundtrack bleed over into the
conversation, making the audience strain to understand what's going on.
And that wouldn't be so bad without the opera music (inserted,
seemingly, to make critics characterize the movie as "operatic"), which
is followed by the classical harmonica trio.  And that wouldn't be so
bad if there wasn't a laughable moment -- straight out of one of those
Gap commercials -- where all the characters sing the same song, one
after the other.  And that wouldn't be so bad... if... if...
If it wasn't for the second-worst thing about Magnolia, which is the
incidental music.  It's the kind of music we've heard ever since
Psycho:  the monotonous repeating tones that signal a big emotional
climax.  Except, in Magnolia, the tones go on for ever... for hours...
and overlay overlapping scene after overlapping scene... and don't ever
lead to anything.  The overall effect is like a trip to the dentist.
It's just bad, no two ways about it, and the fact that this endlessly
mind-numbing music overlays several equally mind-numbing sequences of
boring, overlong exposition.  Magnolia explores many types of negative
emotion -- hate, resentment, anger, bitterness, guilt -- but I wasn't
feeling any of those, just an increasing sense of enervation that
bordered on actual physical pain.
The story of Magnolia is a mismatched jumble of seven or eight different
stories, like a prime time TV soap opera but less coherent.  Magnolia is
one of those movies where it's hard to tell the players without a
scorecard -- especially because they're introduced quickly, over one of
those overloud rock songs I was telling you about -- so here goes:
*  Earl Partridge (Jason Robards), television producer with lung cancer
*  Linda Partridge (Julianne Moore), Earl's wife, dealing with guilt and
depression
*  Phil (Philip Seymour Hoffman), Earl's male nurse
*  Frank "T.J." Mackey (Tom Cruise), Earl's estranged son and wildly
over-the-top misogynistic self-help guru
*  Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall), host of a game show produced by Earl
*  Donnie Smith (William H. Macy), a young contestant on the game show
in 1968
*  Stanley Spector (Jeremy Blackman), a current game show contestant
*  Cynthia (Felicity Huffman), game show producer who probably shouldn't
be in this list except that you should watch Sports Night and complain
when ABC takes it off the air
*  Claudia Gator (Melora Waters), Jimmy Gator's troubled daughter
*  Officer Jim (John C. "Chest Rockwell" Reilly), LAPD trooper who tells
Claudia to turn her music down and then stays for coffee
You would think that it would take a long time to tell all these stories
and find out all the varied ways that people interact with each other,
and you would be right.  You would think that there would be some good
acting with this collection of actors, and you would be right again.
And you would also think that this would take less than three hours.
You would be wrong.
There are any number of good things to recommend Magnolia, from the
lewd, hyperactive antics of Cruise to the gut-wrenching deathbed scene
of Robards to the touching way that Hoffman lights Robards's cigarette,
to the endearingly goofy way that Reilly talks to himself while he's
alone in the police car.  The worst thing about Magnolia is that they
are spread out over three excruciatingly long hours, and that all these
moments take so long to develop.
For example, there's a wonderful scene where Julianne Moore walks into a
pharmacy to pick up an armload of prescriptions.  The pharmacists are
suspicious and let Moore know of their suspicions in an annoying,
patronizing manner, causing Moore to scream at them in helpless rage.
It's a neat scene, but it's actually three or four tiny scenes that are
interspersed with tiny scenes from the other stories.  The final effect
is similar to reading five different James Patterson books serially, one
tiny chapter from one book followed by a chapter from another book, over
and over again.
So, is Magnolia worth seeing?  I didn't think so, not for awhile, until
I remembered another coincidence.
You see, I saw Magnolia on Saturday, January 8, 2000, the same day of
the Tennessee Titans - Buffalo Bills playoff game.  Both Magnolia and
the game ran a little over three hours.  The game was mostly dull, a
tight defensive struggle, but the Bills managed to score a go-ahead
field goal with twenty ticks left on the clock.  As the world knows, the
Titans took the ensuing kickoff back for the winning score on a
completely improbable, unexpected play.  The "Music City Miracle",
they're calling it in the papers today.  That one shattering,
heartbreaking play transformed an otherwiseblah game into something that
will be remembered for years.  And, coincidentally, there is a
shattering, completely unexpected moment towards the end of Magnolia
that you won't see coming.  It's not quite in the same league as a
kickoff return for a touchdown, mind you, but it's the most audacious
plot twist of the year.
In fact, I enjoyed the ending so much that I'm buying my neighbor a
ticket.  If nothing else, I may get three hours of peace and quiet for a
change.
Movie Reviews:
http://www.hsbr.org/buzz/reviewer/reviews/bdreviews.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-curtisedmonds
"JANUARY 1, 1000:  This was the historic day that humanity celebrated
the dawn of our current millennium. The occasion was marked by feasting,
dancing, and the public beheading of a whiny, tedious group of people
who
would not stop insisting that, technically, the new millennium did not
begin until January 1, 1001."  -- Dave Barry
